




PRAYER AVAILETH MUCH
BY
T.M. ANDERSON




Published by Athleo.net





TABLE OF CONTENTS

THE FOREWORD
CHAPTER 1:    THE FELLOWSHIP OF PRAYER
CHAPTER 2:    OUR REQUESTS MADE KNOWN UNTO GOD
CHAPTER 3:    GOD'S PEACE OBTAINED IN ANSWER TO PRAYER
CHAPTER 4:    THE PRAYING THAT GLORIFIES GOD
CHAPTER 5:    PRAYING WITHOUT DOUBTING
CHAPTER 6:    PRAYING WITH DESIRE
CHAPTER 7:    A MANIFESTATION OF GOD IN ANSWER TO PRAYER
CHAPTER 8:    THE INTERCESSORY PRAYERS OF CHRISTIANS
CHAPTER 9:    THE THREE ESSENTIALS OF PRAYER
CHAPTER 10:  ASKING AND RECEIVING
CHAPTER 11:  SEEKING AND FINDING
CHAPTER 12:  THE KNOCKING THAT OBTAINS AN OPENING
CHAPTER 13:  THE IMMORTAL PRAYERS OF THE SAINTS
CHAPTER 14:  CHRIST PLEADS HIS WILL





THE FOREWORD

The brief messages on prayer contained in this little book have been written for 
the purpose of stimulating a greater interest in the importance of praying 
without ceasing.

I am convinced that the people of God have not explored the boundless 
possibilities of prayer.

We evidently believe that the effectual fervent prayer of a righteous man 
availeth much, but we are often aware of the fact that very little has been 
accomplished by our own prayers.

It has not been possible to present a complete study of the subject of prayer 
revealed in the Holy Scriptures. For one to undertake such a task would be like 
an attempt to measure eternity by a span.

It is my sincere desire to encourage God's people to pray without ceasing. When 
once they understand the fundamental principles of prayer, they will not find it 
difficult to accomplish some amazing results through effectual fervent 
intercession.

Your Servant in Christ Jesus,


T. M. ANDERSON





CHAPTER 1

THE FELLOWSHIP OF PRAYER

"Be careful for nothing; but in every thing by prayer and supplication with 
thanksgiving let your requests be made known unto God." -- Phil. 4:6

This timely exhortation stresses the fact that God's people should consult with 
Him in every matter pertaining to life. Unless they see the imperative necessity 
of prayer, and give it an important place in daily life, they cannot expect to 
be maintained by the ample resources of a generous Saviour. It is apparent that 
we cannot obtain the things essential to life unless we make everything 
pertaining to life a matter of earnest prayer. It is impossible to live a 
consistent Christian life in the sight of God by praying occasionally. Praying 
intermittently is certainly not praying incessantly and importunately. Such 
careless praying is not consistent with the exhortation to pray without ceasing.

Persons praying spasmodically are like men that gorge themselves with food and 
drink on special occasions and starve themselves between the feasts. We do not 
live from feast to famine when we enter into a partnership with Christ in 
prayer. We are not disturbed by doubts and defeats when we make everything a 
matter of earnest prayer. We enjoy an unbroken fellowship with Christ when we 
make our requests known unto Him in daily prayer. He imparts to us the necessary 
strength to cope with the temptations and trials incident to life in this 
benighted world when everything relating to life is made known unto Him in 
prayer. When the inspired Apostle said, ". . . Let your requests be made known 
unto God," he was obviously emphasizing the importance of revealing to the Lord 
everything required to sustain us in life. We find it necessary to reveal both 
our spiritual and our temporal needs unto Him in prayer.

Nothing pertaining to our life in this world is unimportant in the sight of God. 
He is interested in everything that concerns us in life.

The Lord would have us understand that we obtain rest of soul when we enter into 
the fellowship of prayer with Him. When Paul said, "Be careful for 
nothing . . . ," he revealed the true rest of soul to be found in the covenant 
of prayer. He is urging us to lay aside our troublesome cares and anxieties lest 
they hinder us in making our requests known unto the Lord. Paul was saying in 
substance, "Be not anxiously solicitous; do not give place to trouble, no matter 
what occurs; for anxiety cannot change the condition of things from bad to good, 
but will certainly injure your soul if you give place to it." It is certainly 
true that we must cast our burdens and earthly concerns upon the Lord before we 
can make our requests known unto Him by prayer and supplication with 
thanksgiving.

Perhaps my personal testimony will enable others to perceive the value of 
entering into the fellowship of prayer with Christ, for I found true rest of 
soul and quietness of heart when I entered into the partnership of prayer with 
Him. "Ask, and ye shall receive, that your joy may be full."

I was teaching in the department of religious education in Asbury College when I 
entered into the covenant of prayer with Christ. It had been my purpose for 
several months to prepare some written messages on the Epistle to the Hebrews. 
In order to have time to devote to this work it was necessary for me to arise 
early in the morning and do the writing before the hour I was scheduled to meet 
my classes. I began this work during the first week of 1950.

I was suddenly awakened about midnight on January sixth. Knowing that I had a 
full day of work before me, I felt it necessary to sleep a few hours lest I be 
too weary in mind and body to do the writing and teaching. At that moment the 
Saviour spoke to me. He asked me if I were willing to sacrifice some sleep in 
order to give Him an opportunity to speak with me in the quiet hours of the 
morning. He told me that it was necessary to deny myself of sleep in order to 
prevail in prayer. I realized for the first time that denying myself of sleep 
was a form of fasting. For five hours I waited before the Lord in sacred worship 
and holy communion. My soul was greatly revived, and I felt refreshed in mind 
and rested in body.

After this remarkable manifestation of the Saviour I was constrained to examine 
my prayer life. I was impressed to consider the time spent in prayer during the 
average day. I was humbled before the Lord when I discovered how little time had 
been given to Him in prayer and meditation. It had been my daily practice from 
the day I was saved to spend some time in prayer morning and evening. I had 
established the family altar in my home. I had spent time in secret prayer 
during the years of my ministry. I had never knowingly overlooked the importance 
of prayer. I am now aware that I had never discovered the possibilities in 
prayer like they were revealed to me when I waited five delightful hours before 
the Saviour that memorable morning.

When I entered into the fellowship of prayer with Christ, I solemnly promised 
Him that I would not allow my plans and pursuits of daily life to infringe on my 
time to pray. I vowed to take sufficient time to commune with Him in prayer no 
matter what duties of the day demanded my attention. When I made this covenant 
with Christ I emptied myself of earthly possessions and concerns. I placed my 
ministry, my teaching, my writings, my vocation, my travels, and my home in a 
heap before the Lord. I separated myself from these interests as completely as 
I ever expect to be separated from them in death. I deliberately put these 
earthly concerns in a place of secondary importance in my life. I counted all 
things loss for the excellency of the knowledge of the fellowship with Christ in 
prayer. I fully realized that Christ was speaking to me when He said, "If any 
man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross, and follow 
me. For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: and whosoever will lose his 
life for my sake shall find it." I was reminded of how much I had lost through 
the years because I had not known the value of fellowship with Christ in prayer.

When I entered the fellowship of prayer with the Lord my soul was immediately 
relieved of the burdens and cares of life. I found the place of His rest in the 
covenant of prayer. My duties are many, and my body is often weary from my 
labors in the ministry, but my spirit knows no weariness for my soul dwells at ease in the haven of perfect peace. There were times in the past when the responsibilities of the ministry were almost more than my mind and body could endure. The many concerns of preaching made me restless in the night and disturbed during the day. It is clear to me now that I had not discovered the secret of resting in the Lord. I was pushing and pulling in my own strength. I was not trusting the Spirit to bring things to pass.

I have the same burdens and cares of the ministry today, but I have discovered 
how to cast my cares upon the Lord in the fellowship of prayer. The yoke of the 
Meek and Lowly Christ is easy, and His burden is light. He has given me rest of 
soul and quietness of spirit in the covenant of daily prayer. It is now my daily 
practice to keep the morning watch with the Saviour.

"My voice shalt thou hear in the morning, O Lord; in the morning will I direct 
my prayer unto thee, and look up." -- Psa. 5:3.

The hours between midnight and six o'clock in the morning are the most peaceful. 
The duties and distractions of the preceding day have ended, and the activities 
of the new day have not begun.

It is apparent that Jesus made it a practice of His life to pray in the quiet 
hours of the morning. It is written,

"In the morning, rising up a great while before day, he went out, and departed 
into a solitary place, and there prayed." -- Mark 1:35.

The duties of the coming day demanded much from the Saviour. The virtue that 
went out of Him to heal the hearts and hurts of the people was replenished in 
the place of prayer. His physical strength was constantly renewed through His 
ceaseless prayers. Before the dawn of the busy day our Lord went out, and 
departed into a solitary place, and there prayed. We are not told where He found 
this peaceful place to pray. He may have found a place of sacred seclusion to 
pray beneath the overshadowing boughs of a towering tree where nature remained 
speechless with reverence and the morning star looked down in solemn 
contemplation. The Lord may have longed to pour out His sinless soul with strong 
crying and tears in some voiceless valley filled with holy hush. It could be 
that He sought a solitary place among the friendly hills where the silent 
shadows of the departing night lingered until hastened into hiding by the light 
of the approaching dawn. Perhaps He found rest for His burdened heart in a 
sequestered place in a lonely desert carpeted with shifting sands where the 
sighing winds ceased to whisper while He prayed.

The example of our Lord enables us to perceive the value of unburdening our 
hearts in the quiet hours of the morning. It is difficult to pray when the mind 
is filled with the confusion and rush of the day. We can pray in the quietness 
of the home while the day is young if we are willing to sacrifice some sleep. 
The Saviour admonished us to enter into the closet and shut the door. We must 
shut the door of our mind and exclude the cares and burdens of the day in order 
to prevail with God in the secret place of prayer.

One will be astonished at the results obtained in the quiet place of prayer. I 
have seen the Lord work wonders in answer to prayer offered before Him in the 
early hours of the morning. I have known Him to heal people in homes and 
hospitals hundreds of miles from the place where I was praying.





CHAPTER 2

OUR REQUESTS MADE KNOWN UNTO GOD

". . . Let your requests be made known unto God." -- Phil. 4:6.

Paul, the pattern saint, would have us see the value of revealing our needs to 
God in prayer. We must not presume that the things required to sustain life will 
be granted without making our requests known unto God. Our requirements on earth 
and God's resources in heaven are meant for each other. If we ask, we shall 
receive. When we fail to ask, we fail to receive. The Word declares, "Ye have 
not, because ye ask not." There would be no point in exhorting Christians to 
make their requests known unto God unless He had made a sufficient provision to 
supply all their need. The apostle revealed the abundant riches of God when he 
said . . .

"My God shall supply all your need according to his riches in glory by Christ 
Jesus." -- Phil. 4:19

This assuring promise discloses the resources God made available to His people 
in answer to prayer. In the clear light of this certified promise they have no 
justifiable excuse for spiritual poverty.

We can think of God's promise to be a certified check made payable to us the 
moment we present it for payment. No matter what gracious spiritual and temporal 
blessings the promise contains, we cannot receive them until we make our 
requests known unto God in prayer. It is possible to have an all sufficiency in 
all things by claiming the riches of God made available to us by prayer and 
supplication with thanksgiving. When Paul said, "My God shall supply all your 
need," he is saying, "Christ is all you need." We are enriched in all things 
pertaining to life in time and in eternity when we possess Him. Christ is all 
we ever need to cope with the difficulties and dangers confronting us in the 
path leading to the Father's house of many mansions.

The temporal blessings received from the Lord are not sufficient to supply all 
our need in this world. Jesus stated this fact when He said,

". . . A man's life consisteth not in the abundance of the things which he 
possesseth." -- Luke 12:14

The fertile fields cannot produce true riches. A man is truly rich toward God 
when he possesses the resources of Christ contained in His certified promise to 
supply all our need. When Paul said, "My God . . ." he disclosed the amazing 
fact that a man can possess God. It is written in the covenant of grace,

". . . I will be their God, and they shall be my people." -- 2 Cor. 6:16.

The paramount purpose of Christ is achieved the moment He gives Himself to us in 
the covenant of God. The Scriptures reveal that the Saviour has given everything 
to redeem us, and provided everything to supply us, and wills to give all that 
He is in His divine nature to satisfy us. If a man has not received the 
indwelling Christ in answer to prayer, he has failed to obtain the grand 
objective of all praying.

We do not find it difficult to make our requests known unto God when we are 
fully aware of His presence. Paul stated this fact when he said,

". . . The Lord is at hand." -- Phil. 4:5

This amazing revelation is evidently an essential part of the admonition to make 
our requests known unto God. The inspired apostle focused attention on a great 
truth when he said, ". . . The Lord is at hand." He is saying in substance, "The 
Lord is handy. The Lord stands ready to give aid and comfort to His praying 
people." No matter how we interpret the statement, ". . . The Lord is at hand," 
we are fully aware of His nearness when we make our requests known unto Him. 
Jesus confirmed this truth when He said, "Lo, I am with you always, even unto 
the end of the world." He evidently knew that we had the mental and moral 
capacity to sense His presence at all times and in all places on earth. If we 
cannot know that He is at hand when we pray, then His promise has no place of 
value in our profession of faith.

To offer a prayer without realizing the nearness of the Lord would be like 
speaking meaningless words into empty space. How could we know that our requests 
had been made known unto God unless He responded by assuring us that our 
petitions had been heard? I am persuaded that it is not possible to pray with 
confidence toward the Lord without being aware of His presence. The inspired 
apostle said,

". . . This is the confidence that we have in him, that, if we ask any thing 
according to his will, he heareth us: and if we know that he hear us, whatsoever 
we ask, we know that we have the petitions that we desired of Him." -- 
1 John 5:14, 15

John is saying in substance, "If you know that God hears you, then you know you 
have the answer." It is apparent that we must first know that He hears us before 
we know that we have the answer. Knowing that God hears us when we pray is 
something vastly more than a beautiful theory about prayer. Spiritual perception 
in prayer is the norm of spiritual life. We rejoice in prayer when we perceive 
that the Lord is at hand. Paul said, "Rejoice in the Lord always: and again I 
say, rejoice." The realization that the Lord is near is the cause of constant 
praise.

If His abiding presence with us in this troubled world is not the only source of 
lasting joys, then let us hope that someone will come to guide our footsteps 
toward the place of endless happiness. God's Word reveals that the Lord will 
direct our weary feet into the path of praise.

"Thou wilt show me the path of life: in thy presence is fullness of joy; at thy 
right hand are pleasures for evermore." -- Psa. 16:11.

It is apparently true that the measure of our joy is always in proportion to the 
measure of our praying. One must pray without ceasing in order to have joy 
unspeakable and full of glory. God's praying people discover that the joy of the 
Lord is their strength, and His abiding presence is their shield. Perhaps Paul 
was in prison when he uttered the immortal words of praise. The dark and dingy 
prison was not so carefully guarded, and its rigid bars so firmly fixed that the 
Lord was prevented from entering its dismal confines to give comfort and courage 
to His suffering servant.

If Paul had been asked what he had found in the dank cell to cause him to sound 
such a note of praise, he would have said, ". . . The Lord is at hand." His 
consoling nearness caused the prisoner to praise, and His assuring presence 
inspired the suffering saint to sing. The dreary confines of a prison cannot 
stifle the songs of the soul girded with the gladness of God. The righteous may 
be incarcerated in dungeons, and the redeemed fastened in the stocks, but their 
achieving faith is not fettered, and their supplications are not shackled. From 
the inner cell of the common jail the singing servants of God shook the 
foundations of the earth, and caused hardened sinners to seek salvation.

The infirmities of the body may imprison a saint like the formidable walls of a 
federal prison; but the afflictions of the flesh and the trials of life cannot 
prevent the saints from singing in the shadows like those that sing in the 
shining. It is written,

". . . He that trusteth in the Lord, mercy shall compass him about. Be glad in 
the Lord, and rejoice, ye righteous: and shout for joy, all ye that are upright 
in heart." -- Psa. 32:11.





CHAPTER 3

GOD'S PEACE OBTAINED IN ANSWER TO PRAYER

". . . Let your requests be made known unto God. And the peace of God which 
passeth all understanding, shall keep your hearts and minds through Christ 
Jesus." -- Phil. 4:6, 7.

When we make our requests known unto God by prayer and supplication with 
thanksgiving we are assured of receiving His peace through Christ Jesus. When we 
enter into the sacred Presence of the Prince of Peace, we enter into the place 
of perfect peace. The house of prayer is the sanctuary of peace.

Paul would have us understand that Christ imparts a measure of His own peace to 
our worshiping hearts when we make everything pertaining to life a matter of 
prayer. We can readily comprehend the possibilities of prayer when we perceive 
that mortal man can obtain a measure of the peace which the God of Peace 
possesses in His divine nature. It is not necessary for the children of God to 
enter heaven in order to enjoy the priceless possession of peace. Christ wills 
to give the heavenly heritage of His Peace to all the sons of God. He revealed 
this truth when He said,

"Peace I leave with you, my peace I give unto you: not as the world giveth, give 
I unto you. Let not your heart be troubled, neither let it be afraid." -- 
John 14:27.

It is obviously true that Jesus has purposed that His own peace shall give His 
praying and believing people untroubled hearts in this world of trouble. He 
would have us understand that His own perfect peace shall confirm us in hope, 
and comfort us in heart. It is apparent that this heavenly heritage of the heart 
can be obtained in answer to prayer. God's peace is an essential quality of His 
divine nature. We saw His peace manifested in Jesus Christ, The Prince of Peace. 
Jesus was never excited and perturbed by the trickery and hypocrisy of the 
religious leaders of His day. He never lost His spiritual poise when persecuted 
and slandered by His enemies.

Jesus was always calm and composed in the time of trial. He was never 
intimidated by the threats of violence. He had an indomitable courage that 
confounded His critics. He never compromised truth to gain favor with men. His 
sublime silence in the hour of His trial caused the multitude to marvel. A 
faithful witness of the Saviour's sufferings said:

". . . Christ also suffered for us, leaving us an example, that we should follow 
in his steps: who did no sin, neither was guile found in his mouth: who, when he 
was reviled, reviled not again; when he suffered, he threatened not; but 
committed himself to him that judgeth righteously." -- 1 Peter 2:21-23

Peter's testimony enables us to see how the peace of God behaves in this world 
of turmoil and strife. The quality of God's peace was exemplified in the sinless 
character and conduct of the Saviour. His life revealed the inherent nature of 
God's peace which passeth all understanding. God has designed that His peace 
shall keep our hearts and minds. He would have us understand that His peace 
shall be our guard when we make our requests known unto Him in prayer. When once 
we grasp the truth about this, and give it an important place in daily life, we 
will know what it means to possess the peace of God which passeth all 
understanding.

The heart is the center of man's spiritual being. It is the citadel of his 
immortal soul. The ambitions, the aspirations, and the affections reside in the 
heart. The will, the conscience, and the desires dwell in the heart of man. The 
Word says,

"Keep thy heart with all diligence; for out of it are the issues of life." -- 
Prov. 4:23

It is God's purpose to expel the indwelling sin of the soul by the power of the 
indwelling Spirit, and impart peace to man's heart.

". . . The work of righteousness shall be peace; and the effect of righteousness 
quietness and assurance for ever." -- Isa. 32:17

When Jesus said. ". . . Let not your heart be troubled, neither let it be 
afraid," He implied that it was possible to be delivered from the perplexing 
troubles and agitating fears incident to life in this world. The peace of God 
can banish all our burdensome bewilderments and fill our yearning hearts with 
comfort and contentment. God is willing to make the citadel of our souls the 
stronghold of His garrison of peace. He wills to make our hearts an impregnable 
fortress of spiritual power. His peace will mount guard over our hearts and 
minds like a sentinel appointed to keep watch over a city. Paul added to our 
comfort when he said,

". . . The God of peace shall be with you." -- v. 9.

He is saying that we can have the peace of God within, and God of peace without.

When Paul speaks of the mind he is evidently speaking of the intellect, the 
feelings, and the understanding. We have the capacity to think and to reason 
about the things of God. We are capable of having the truth of God revealed to 
us by the Holy Spirit. It is not possible to comprehend the peace of God without 
the help of the Spirit. We cannot analyze the peace of God in the laboratory of 
the human mind to ascertain its true nature; neither can we discover the 
component parts of God's peace by the methods of modern science and philosophy. 
His peace passeth all human understanding. There are times when our minds are 
sorely perplexed by the problems confronting us in this uncertain world. There 
are times when we cannot depend on our reasoning to find the answer to life's 
trials and tribulations. Jesus said,

". . . In the world ye shall have tribulation: but be of good cheer; I have 
overcome the world." -- John 16:33

Life has no fears and death holds no terrors for the soul fortified by the 
eternal peace of Christ. He is our peace and our protection. The peace received 
in answer to prayer does not prevent the problems of life from perplexing us; 
but His peace does prevent these trials from triumphing over us.

There will be times when our feelings will contradict our faith. Sickness can 
depress our emotions to such an extent that we are disposed to doubt our 
relationship to Christ. When we are sick, when our nerves are tense, when we are 
constantly on the verge of tears, our faith will be submerged by our feelings. 
In such times of trial it seems that the joy of the Lord has departed, and we 
are tempted to think that for some unknown reason we are suffering the 
displeasure of the Lord. Our confused state of mind is caused by our illness. 
The loving Lord has not been grieved by our infirmities of body and mind.

There will be times in life when we seem to stand on the brink of an impassable 
gulf which the human understanding cannot cross. When we come to the place where 
reasoning ends and despair begins, we will discover that Christ's protective 
peace is like a bridge that spans the gulf which our own limited understanding 
cannot cross. The infirmities of the body can cause the imagination to run wild. 
Sickness can cause many fantastic ideas and strange impressions to disturb and 
confuse our minds. Some unhappy people imagine they are being tormented by evil 
spirits. Some think their nervous disorders are caused by some strange power of 
Satan. These distressing nervous disorders and groundless fears are caused by 
their physical condition. A just and holy God will not allow His praying and 
trusting people to become the unwilling victims of satanic power. He has 
provided a peace to garrison their hearts and minds through Christ Jesus.

A few devout individuals have been tormented by the fear that they have 
committed the unpardonable sin. Some have been so completely engulfed by this 
terrifying thought that they have abandoned all hope. These misguided persons 
have allowed themselves to become victims of their own confused state of mind. 
The terrifying thought that they have forfeited all hope of salvation exists 
only in their overwrought imaginations. If these troubled souls will exercise 
faith in a merciful and faithful Christ, and humbly ask Him for help and hope, 
their groundless fears will immediately pass away, and the peace of God will 
comfort their troubled hearts.

The Saviour has paid a great price to redeem us from all iniquity. He will not 
withhold His saving mercy and grace from any seeking soul longing with all the 
heart to please Him in all things. The peace of God will prevent us from 
becoming the hapless prey of our distraught minds if we will pray without 
ceasing, and continue to believe on the name of the Son of God. When Jesus said, 
". . . Let not your heart be troubled, neither let it be afraid," He intended to 
impress us with the fact that we can prevent the fears and troubles from 
entering our hearts and minds. He expects us to keep our minds stayed on Him. 
The inspired prophet saw this fact when he said,

"Thou wilt keep him in perfect peace, whose mind is stayed on thee; because he 
trusteth in thee." -- Isa. 26:3

The Psalmist said,

"Cast thy burden upon the Lord, and he shall sustain thee: he shall never suffer 
the righteous to be moved." -- Psa. 55:22...

If we continue to make our requests known unto God by prayer and supplication 
with thanksgiving, He will not suffer us to be moved by the forces of evil in 
this disquieted earth.





CHAPTER 4

THE PRAYING THAT GLORIFIES GOD

". . . Whatsoever ye shall ask in my name, that will I do, that the Father may 
be glorified in the Son." -- John 14:13.

Jesus revealed His purpose in answering prayer when He said, ". . . That the 
Father may be glorified in the Son." In order to achieve His exalted purpose to 
glorify the Father, the Son has bestowed on His redeemed people the inalienable 
right to ask anything in His Name. In the clear light of this remarkable truth 
it is not difficult to perceive that the possibilities in prayer are as great as 
the purpose of the Son of God. It is likewise apparent that every prayer offered 
in the Name of the Son must be offered for the specific purpose of obtaining the 
things which glorify the heavenly Father.

The Saviour was near the close of His public ministry with His disciples when He 
delivered His parting address preserved for us by John. In His closing address 
He speaks to the men whose training time has about ended. He instructed His 
messengers in the "Sermon on the Mount" to pray, believing and trusting the 
Father to give them all good gifts; but in His closing discourse He points to 
something higher to be accomplished through prayer and faith. These faithful men 
were to go and perform His works, even greater works than He had achieved during 
His ministry in the world. The Master disclosed to them that praying in His Name 
was to be the channel through which the enabling power was obtained to perform 
the works which glorify the Father in the Son.

When Jesus said, ". . . I go to my Father," He was obviously speaking of His 
ascension to the right hand of God. His exaltation to the right hand of the 
Majesty on high began a new epoch in the praying and working of the disciples. 
The Saviour had imparted power to His chosen disciples while with them in the 
world, and He now purposes to enable them to do greater things for Him. He has 
promised to impart the power from heaven to accomplish greater works for Him in 
the world. He ordained His chosen apostles to go and bring forth fruit, saying,

"Herein is my Father glorified, that ye bear much fruit; so shall ye be my 
disciples." -- John 15:8.

The indomitable courage they had to witness for Him, the miracles performed in 
His Name, and the sufferings endured for His sake, were living testimonies of 
the power received through the fervent prayers offered in His Name.

What is true regarding the Saviour's works achieved by His faithful disciples is 
likewise true regarding His works to be accomplished by His faithful people in 
this present age. The same Christ who worked in them and through them in that 
day, is the same changeless Christ who wills to work in and through His people 
in these last days. If the people of God expect to perform the works of Christ 
which shall glorify the Father, they must believe on Him for the very work's 
sake, and pray in His Name.

We can perceive our responsibilities to Christ when we consider His words 
regarding the greater works to be accomplished for Him in the world. Apparently 
the greater works to be performed are not works more excellent in quality, but 
works greater in quantity. Perhaps the ministry of Jesus did not extend beyond 
the borders of the land where He lived and died. But it is obvious that He fully 
intended that the whole world should feel the spiritual impact of His invincible 
power through the preaching and praying of His ransomed people. Therefore He 
filled His faithful witnesses with the Holy Ghost and power and sent them unto 
the uttermost part of the earth to perform the works which glorify the Father in 
the Son. Let us ever be mindful of the fact that power to achieve the greater 
works for Christ is obtained through prayer and faith. A man cannot achieve the 
works of Christ through his eloquence and education; he must fervently pray in 
the Name of Jesus, and receive power from Him in order to accomplish the works 
of God in this pleasure loving age.

As long as Jesus was in the world, He performed the works of the Father; devils 
fled at His word of command, the sick were healed, and the poor had the Gospel 
preached unto them. When He returned to the Father, His works from the throne of 
grace must be performed through His praying and trusting people. The oneness 
between the Lord on His mediatorial throne in heaven and His people on earth is 
so divinely perfect, that He meant it as the literal truth when He said, ". . . 
Greater works than these shall he do; because I go unto my Father."

It is for the express purpose of accomplishing the works of Jesus in this 
present world that such great promises regarding prayer have been given to His 
people. But His people are not at liberty to claim the Saviour's promise, "If ye 
shall ask any thing in my name, I will do it," in order to obtain something very 
special for themselves. His certified promise does not authorize us to make him 
a servant of our own comforts in life. The Master has assured us that the Father 
is mindful of our personal needs, and wills to give good things to His children, 
but our creature comforts are not the things which matter most in this life. Our 
chief concern should always be to obtain power through prayer to achieve the 
greater works for Christ.

A careful study of the Saviour's words reveal that it is His purpose to glorify 
the Father through the life and love and labors of His redeemed people. When 
once we fully comprehend this amazing truth it will not be difficult to 
understand the meaning of the praying that glorifies the Father in the Son. When 
Jesus said, ". . . He that believeth on me, the works that I do shall he do 
also. . . ," He revealed the obvious fact that a man has both the mental and 
moral capacity to perform the works of God in this world. It is apparently true 
that all men do not have the same natural abilities to serve God in this world. 
The Master disclosed this truth in His parable relating to the Kingdom of 
heaven.

"Unto one he gave five talents, to another two, and to another one; to every man 
according to his several ability . . ." -- Matt. 25:15

Jesus would have us understand that each man shall be rewarded according to his 
faithfulness in performing his assigned task. The Master will not require more 
than any man is capable of doing for Him. It is impossible for any man to 
accomplish the works of Christ unless he first possesses the works of Christ in 
his own heart. We must not overlook the fact that moral character and moral 
conduct are so intimately related that one does not exist apart from the other. 
A man's character is always exemplified in his conduct. The Saviour said,

"A good man out of the good treasure of his heart bringeth forth that which is 
good..." -- Luke 6:45

Jesus revealed the effective cause for achieving His works when He said,

". . . The Father that dwelleth in me, he doeth the works." -- John 14:10

Paul stated this sublime truth when he said,

"For it is God which worketh in you both to will and to do of his good 
pleasure." -- Phil. 2:13

It certainly is possible for Almighty God to impart the inherent qualities of 
His divine nature to a redeemed soul, seeing that He did impart His image and 
likeness to the first man in the original creation. When Jesus said, ". . . I go 
to my Father," He was speaking of His death on the cross and His ascension to 
the throne in heaven. If we sincerely believe in the provisional sacrifice of 
Christ on the cross, we must believe that the inherent graces of mercy, truth, 
and holiness together with the fruit of the Spirit can be produced in the heart 
of mortal man.

When we request Christ to perform His works in our hearts we are devoutly 
praying that the Father may be glorified in the Son. We must open the doors of 
our hearts and extend to the Father, the Son and the Holy Spirit the right to 
rule us for ever, when we truly pray that the Father may be glorified in His 
Son. Jesus assured us that the heavenly Father would make His abode with us in 
answer to prayer. Surely a people so signally blessed would be able to exemplify 
the greater works of Christ in their diligent labors. It is apparent that our 
Lord has not limited the power made available to His people through prayer in 
His Name. When He said, ". . . I will do it," He placed His unlimited power at 
our disposal. He reveals himself to be an Almighty Servant standing ready and 
willing to do anything and everything pertaining to His works in answer to 
prayer. While meditating on these amazing promises it is necessary to keep in 
mind that the primary purpose of Christ in answering prayer is, "That the Father 
may be glorified in the Son."

The measure of our faith and the fervency of our prayers determine the 
effectiveness of our labors for Christ. If our faith is weak and our praying 
passionless we cannot expect to achieve much for Him. A man can ease his 
accusing conscience by explaining that he failed to accomplish the works of 
Christ because of adverse conditions where he lives and labors. When a man is 
willing to face the facts, he may discover that he failed because he had not 
believed in Christ for the very work's sake, and prayed fervently in His Name. 
We cannot justify our failures by pleading our lack of natural ability. I am 
persuaded that God does not impart a greater measure of natural ability to us 
when we are saved by grace, but I do firmly believe that He releases the powers 
of our souls when we give ourselves to Him. Only the Creator knows the latent 
forces and inherent potentialities in an immortal soul. When these spiritual 
powers are released by the indwelling Spirit of God the whole world can feel the 
dynamic force of a living Christ.

When Jesus said, ". . . Believe me for the very works' sake," He was pleading 
for a faith that would not fail to give the message of redeeming love to the 
whole world. He was thinking of the generations yet unborn when He gave us the 
right to ask anything in His Name. While Jesus was in the world, mankind could 
see His miracles, hear His messages, and be blessed by His ministry. The 
astonishing fact is that the people of yesterday saw Him crucified, dead and 
buried, but cared very little about Jesus of Nazareth, the penniless preacher of 
Palestine. They were too engrossed in their own affairs of life to be impressed 
by a suffering Saviour. The world of today is too busy to be bothered with 
thoughts of life eternal. It is God's will to reveal the Son's works to a 
perishing world. He has willed that the works of His Son shall be accomplished 
in this present world through the labors and consistent living of His people.

Let us heed the pleadings of the Christ, and believe His promise to answer our 
prayers that the Father may be glorified in His Son. Let us continue to believe 
on Him for the very work's sake and pray in His Name for power to achieve the 
victory for Him on earth. No matter how sorely we are tried, nor how dark the 
hours may seem in times of sufferings, we must continue to pray that the Father 
may be glorified in the Son through our services and sacrifices in His work. Let 
us ever keep in mind that the countless years which have fled into the dateless 
past have not outmoded the works of Christ, neither shall the oncoming ages 
overthrow them. His glorious works of grace performed in our hearts and 
exemplified in our living and labors shall glorify the Father in the Son 
throughout all ages, world without end.





CHAPTER 5

PRAYING WITHOUT DOUBTING

". . . And shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that those things 
which he saith shall come to pass; he shall have whatsoever he saith." -- 
Mark 11:23

These interesting words are a part of the Saviour's discourse on the power of 
faith. The disciples were greatly astonished by the power manifested in the 
Master's words which dried up the fruitless tree from the roots. When Jesus 
arrested the attention of His disciples by this unusual miracle, He obviously 
intended to reveal the power of God made available to His people through the 
prayer of faith. When Peter called the Lord's attention to the withered tree He 
said, ". . . Have faith in God. For verily I say unto you, That whosoever shall 
say unto this mountain, Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea; and 
shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that those things which he saith 
shall come to pass; he shall have whatsoever he saith."

In order to understand truth about praying without doubt in our hearts it is 
necessary to consider the Saviour's opening statement, ". . . Have faith in 
God." The remarkable discourse following His opening words reveals the 
fundamental fact relating to the prayer of faith. Our Lord would have us see 
that we can possess the faith of God. He revealed this fact when He said, "Have 
faith in God." It would be utterly impossible to believe that those things which 
we say in prayer shall come to pass unless we had an implicit faith in God. When 
Jesus said, ". . . Have faith in God," He revealed the Source of the priceless 
possession of the faith which enables us to pray without a doubt in our hearts. 
His admonition to have faith in God implies that all men have an inherent faith 
derived from God when He created the first man in His own image. The quality of 
inherited faith was not destroyed in the fall although it was greatly impaired as 
a result of disobedience. Jesus disclosed the amazing fact that we can possess a 
measure of the faith which Almighty God possesses in His own Divine Nature. This 
fact should not seem incredible since it is true that God did impart a measure of 
His own faith to man at the beginning of creation.

We do not hesitate to accept the fact that God imparts a measure of His life and 
love to His redeemed people. Surely it is not impossible for Him to impart a 
sufficient measure of His faith to His people to sustain them in life in this 
world of doubt and disbelief. If His people are not able to accomplish His works 
in the world because of the littleness of their faith, there is no valid reason 
to doubt that He can and will increase their measure of achieving faith. When 
the disciples said, ". . . Lord, Increase our faith," we have reasons to believe 
that He granted their request. (See Luke 17:5.)

The Saviour did not imply that we could possess the same measureless degree of 
faith which the infinite God possesses in His Divine Person. But He did 
encourage us to believe that we can receive a measure of God's faith to enable 
us to accomplish His purpose in redemption. The Saviour would have us see that 
we can enter into the faith of God and become workers together with Him in 
achieving His eternal purpose in His beloved Son. It is obviously true that God 
works in His people and through them according to the degree of their faith. He 
cannot do great things unless His people can believe Him for great things. 
Christ is made invincible in this world through the unwavering faith of His 
praying people.

The Scriptures reveal that Christ works according to His own faith, and His 
people enter into His faith and work with Him in accomplishing His purpose in 
redemption. The fact that He works according to His own faith is as 
understandable as the fact that a man works according to his own faith. A man 
can plan to build his house long before he lays the first stone in the 
foundation. He can plan for the happiness of a family before a child is born to 
gladden his heart. It is also true that a man's family can enter into his faith 
and assist him to achieve his purpose in life. Surely it is possible for the 
redeemed family of Christ to enter into His faith and participate in His eternal 
purpose to achieve the final victory over sin and death. The Son of God is not 
limited by circumstances, neither is He lacking in adequate resources to supply 
the need of His family on earth. Nothing shall prevent Him from bringing many 
sons unto glory according to the will of the heavenly Father.

We can pray without a doubt regarding the power of God. We can perceive the 
truth about Christ's eternal verities when we consider His statement about 
removing the mountain at the word of command. We are aware that the mountain has 
no power within itself to obey the word of command, ". . . Be thou removed, and 
be thou cast into the sea. . . " It is also obvious that the mountain is not 
removed by the efforts of man. Therefore we must conclude that the person 
speaking the words that remove the mountain has access to a power sufficient to 
remove the mountain and have it cast into the sea. The words of Jesus warrant us 
in saying that this power is made available to His praying people through faith. 
If this is not the truth then we must conclude that the words of Christ have no 
meaningful application to the perplexing problems of daily life. We are aware 
that the Master's words are figurative yet they are factual. The mountain 
evidently represents something that God will remove in answer to the prayer of 
faith.

Let us assume that the mountain represents the mass of human misery caused by 
sin in this troubled earth. It is certainly true that no man has power within 
himself to remove the mass of physical and mental sufferings caused by sin in 
this world. It is likewise true that no man has the strength of will to remove 
the mountain of iniquity which stands between himself and a holy God. Sin rests 
on his guilty soul like the weight of the hills. A man's load of depravity gives 
him a heavy heart and a burdened spirit. When we look at the mass of human 
suffering resulting from sin, we can visualize the insurmountable difficulties 
confronting humanity in this distressed earth. The bewildering sufferings caused 
by the sins of men constitute a mountain of misery and woe more formidable and 
forbidding than all the precipitous heights and impregnable rocks of earth's 
tallest peaks.

Christ is our only hope for deliverance in this disconsolate world. If faith in 
Him cannot bring the power necessary to surmount these difficulties, then faith 
has failed utterly to achieve the victory we have a right to expect in the light 
of God's unfailing promises. The imperishable Word declares, ". . . The just 
shall live by faith." How can we obey this fundamental law of life unless we can 
avail ourselves of a power sufficient to overcome every opposing force? We 
cannot doubt God's willingness to impart to His praying saints a sufficiency of 
spiritual strength to cope with the trials incident to life. The Scriptures 
record the victories achieved by the saints of God who were made immortal in 
sacred history by their dauntless courage and unwavering faith.

Let us pray the prayer of faith, not doubting in our hearts, but believing that 
strength shall be given day by day to surmount our difficulties in life. Let us 
not falter in the way as we journey toward fadeless dawn of the eternal day.

We can pray without a doubt regarding the purpose of God. The Scriptures reveal 
that it is God's eternal purpose in Christ to save all men from all sin on the 
condition of repentance and faith.

Christ has faith in His own ability to accomplish the Father's purpose by 
restoring a fallen man to the moral image of God. Nothing shall prevent Him from 
fulfilling His eternal purpose as revealed in the divine plan of salvation. 
There is not the remotest possibility that His perfect plan of redemption shall 
fail. We are assured that the gates of hell shall not prevail against Christ's 
invincible church, purchased by His blood, endowed, and endued by His Spirit.

We do well to ponder Paul's immortal challenge,

"What shall we then say to these things? If God be for us, who can be against 
us?" -- Rom. 8:31.

When once we have a proper concept of God's immutable purpose as revealed in His 
Word, it will not be difficult to pray without a doubt. Let us look again at the 
Saviour's words, ". . . And shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that 
those things which he saith shall come to pass. . ." For the sake of clarity, 
let us underscore the words, ". . . Shall come to pass . . ." When shall those 
things which we say in prayer come to pass? When may we reasonably expect every 
prayer to be answered? The things we have said in prayer shall come to pass when 
everything spoken by the Lord shall come to pass. When God's plan of salvation 
has been consummated, then all things spoken by the Son of God, and all things 
spoken by the mouth of His holy prophets, and all the things spoken in the 
prayers of His faithful people shall come to pass.

The Scriptures affirm that it is God's purpose to save them to the uttermost 
that come unto Him through Christ. God's utmost ability was required to save us 
from the utmost extent of our sin. To be saved to the uttermost according to the 
purpose of Christ, means to be delivered from all sin in this present life, and 
delivered from the effects of sin in the body and mind in the life to come.

We can pray without a doubt in our hearts regarding a complete deliverance from 
sin in this present life, and it shall come to pass. But we must patiently wait 
until Christ's final triumph over sin and death before we can be delivered from 
the results of sin in our bodies and minds. We can pray without a doubt in our 
hearts regarding our final deliverance, and it shall come to pass according to 
the purpose of God. When Christ has fulfilled His eternal purpose in redemption, 
then the mountain of human misery and woe shall be removed from the earth. When 
we perceive this truth as revealed in the Scriptures, we can understand that 
every prayer offered without a doubt in our hearts shall surely be answered in 
full.

The things we say in prayer are powerless and meaningless unless we have 
Christ's authority to say them. But if the things we say in our prayers are the 
things which He has said, then we can pray without a doubt in our hearts.

We find this truth revealed in the Master's words concerning the mountain being 
removed at the word of command. Take note of the fact that Jesus first spoke the 
words, ". . . Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea . . ." Assuming 
that the mountain symbolizes the mass of human woe and suffering caused by sin, 
we perceive that it is possible to have this mass of human misery removed by 
speaking the living words of Jesus in our prayer. It is apparent that we can 
enter in to His faith and engage His omnipotent power to achieve victory over 
sin and death. When we pray without a doubt in our hearts, we share Christ's 
faith to achieve the purpose of the Father. When we speak His words, we have a 
valid reason to expect the things we say to come to pass.

Our prayers can embrace every word of promise and every word of purpose spoken 
by our Lord. Our faith and prayers can join His faith and prayers and assist 
Him in the final fulfillment of His Father's will and work. When applying this 
gracious truth to the things which Christ has spoken in explicit terms of 
eternal truth, it is not difficult to see that our prayer of faith becomes an 
integral part of the whole plan of redemption. We are assured that every word 
spoken in prayer shall be answered in the final restitution of all things. It is 
written,

"And He shall send Jesus Christ, which before was preached unto you: Whom the 
heaven must receive until the times of restitution of all things, which God hath 
spoken by the mouth of all his holy prophets since the world began." 
Acts 3:20, 21

Paul vividly revealed the final triumph of Christ when he said,

"Then cometh the end, when he shall have delivered up the kingdom to God, even 
the Father; when he shall have put down all rule and all authority and power. 
For he must reign, till he hath put all enemies under his feet. The last enemy 
that shall be destroyed is death." -- 1 Cor. 15:24-26

Our hope and expectation for final deliverance from all effects of evil in our 
bodies and minds shall be realized when He shall come to be glorified in His 
saints, and to be admired in all them that believe in that day. When He shall 
appear we shall be like Him, for we shall see Him as He is. We shall share in 
His final victory over disease and death. We shall hear Him say to the mountain 
of sufferings, ". . . Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea. . . ," 
and it shall come to pass.

In view of this consoling hope let us continue to pray without a doubt in our 
hearts. Let us rest our faith on the enduring love of Christ, asking nothing 
more than to be counted worthy of His pleasure throughout all ages, world 
without end.





CHAPTER 6

PRAYING WITH DESIRE

". . . What things soever ye desire, when ye pray, believe that ye receive them, 
and ye shall have them." -- Mark 11:24.

These inspiring words of Jesus disclose that He has obligated Himself to satisfy 
the incessant and insistent desires of His praying people. His words leave no 
doubt in our minds regarding His willingness to answer our requests. He makes it 
plain that whatsoever things are required to satisfy our spiritual and temporal 
needs shall be granted according to the measure of our faith.

We must obey the fundamental law of faith by sincerely believing that we receive 
the things desired when we pray, otherwise they shall not be granted. It is 
necessary to do some clear thinking regarding our Lord's promise to give us the 
things desired when we pray in faith.

Some unwise persons have interpreted Jesus as saying, "When ye pray, believe 
that you have the things desired, and you have them." It is difficult to accept 
this concept of the Master's teaching about the prayer of faith. No intelligent 
man can believe that he has received the things desired unless he has received 
them. It would be absurd to make such a claim in the light of truth.

It is misleading to tell a sincere seeker after a pure heart to believe that the 
blessing has been received when that person knows in his own heart that it is 
not true. This absurd teaching leaves a man confused and disappointed. A man 
must receive the witness of the Holy Spirit to confirm the work of grace 
performed in the heart. An honest man cannot affirm that he has obtained the 
things desired unless he knows that he has received them from God.

We must not assume that we have the things desired. Our faith does not rest on 
an assumption; our faith rests on an assurance imparted to us by the spirit of 
truth. When Jesus revealed His provision to satisfy our desires, He disclosed 
the incentive to pray. He is saying, "Whatsoever things you desire, when you 
pray, believe that God has provided them, and you shall have them."

We must first believe that the resources of God are made available to us through 
prayer. If we entertain the slightest doubt in our hearts regarding this fact, 
we cannot obtain the things desired to satisfy us in life.

While seriously meditating on the remarkable words of Jesus concerning the 
things desired in prayer, let us not overlook the fact that He is speaking about 
the mountain being removed at the word of command. If it is God's purpose to 
remove all sin and sufferings from the earth at His word of command, then it is 
likewise true that everything required to accomplish His purpose on behalf of 
His people is made available to them in the provision of redeeming grace. When 
we see this truth we can understand God's purpose in establishing the throne of 
grace. Is it any wonder that we are told to come boldly unto the throne of 
grace? We can readily understand the real incentive to pray when we know that 
our legitimate desires will be granted when we pray for things pertaining to the 
plan of redemption as revealed in Christ. There is no provision made to gratify 
our desires unless the things desired are directly related to Christ's plan of 
salvation.

The primary purpose of the Saviour's sacrifice on the cross was to save us from 
sin and sufferings. It is His purpose to present us faultless before the 
presence of the Father with exceeding joy. It is our Lord's purpose to dry our 
tears for ever, open the gates of pearl, and give us an abundant entrance into 
the City of God. It is permissible to interpret Jesus as saying, "Whatsoever 
things are required to satisfy you and sustain you in this holy way of life, 
when you pray, believe that you can obtain them, and you shall have them."

It has not required one tear of sorrow, nor exacted one drop of our blood, nor 
cost us one night of sleep to provide the things required to save us from sin 
and sufferings in this world. The unsparing God gave His only Son to provide the 
things we need for time and eternity.

There are no unholy and selfish desires in the heart of a Christian. A true 
Christian is motivated to pray by the normal desires of spiritual life like a 
hungry son is moved to ask bread of his father. The child's desire for food does 
not spring from force of habit, it is a desire springing from the natural 
requirements of daily life. The incentive to pray is as normal as the desire for 
food and drink. The very fact that the desire exists is positive proof that it 
can be satisfied in a natural and legitimate manner.

There is an intense longing after Christ like the hunger and thirst of a person 
requiring food and drink. Such a desire cannot be satisfied with anything less 
than a manifestation of the living Lord. There is a desire to know more about 
His enduring love. There is a desire to linger long in sacred worship and holy 
communion with Him in the quiet place of prayer. A Christian says,

"My soul followeth hard after thee . . ." -- Psa. 63:8

The inspired writer voiced his desire when he said,

"As the hart panteth after the water brooks, so panteth my soul after thee, O 
God. My soul thirsteth for God, for the living God: when shall I come and appear 
before God?" -- Psa. 42:1, 2

A man can earn his daily bread by the sweat of his brow, and allay his thirst at 
the springs flowing out of the earth, but a man that hungers and thirsts after 
Christ must have the bread from heaven to satisfy his hunger, and drink the 
living water from the fountain of life to slake his thirst.

We desire a freedom which cannot be obtained while we live in this body. We long 
to be delivered from our earthly bondage into the glorious liberty of the first 
resurrection. In this human body we yearn, earnestly desiring to be clothed upon 
with our house which is from heaven.

"For we that are in this tabernacle do groan, being burdened: not for that we 
would be unclothed, but clothed upon, that mortality might be swallowed up of 
life." -- 2 Cor. 5:4

When the eternal purpose of Christ has been completed, the saints shall be 
delivered from the presence of sin and sorrows which have troubled them in this 
unhappy earth. In that glad hour they shall experience the glorious liberty of 
the sons of God.

God's redeemed children have no continuing city in this world. They look for a 
city which hath foundations, whose builder and maker is God. Their citizenship 
is in heaven; from whence they also look for the Saviour, the Lord Jesus Christ: 
who shall change their infirm bodies, that they may be fashioned like unto His 
glorious body, according to the working wherewith He is able even to subdue all 
things unto Himself. When these things shall come to pass, then shall we obtain 
the end of our faith, even the salvation of our souls.





CHAPTER 7

A MANIFESTATION OF GOD IN ANSWER TO PRAYER

". . . When they had prayed, the place was shaken where they were assembled 
together; and they were all filled with the Holy Ghost, and they spake the word 
of God with boldness." -- Acts 4:31.

This remarkable manifestation of God reveals the effectiveness of prevailing 
prayer. It vividly discloses the fact that prayer can accomplish much. It is 
apparent that neither the apostles, nor the assembled company of devout 
believers were astonished at the marvelous visitation of God. They had assembled 
together in one place for the express purpose of achieving victory over the 
opposition of wicked men, and they fully expected the Lord to answer their 
united prayers in His own way.

Perhaps the shaking of the place where they were assembled together was an 
extraordinary occurrence, but receiving a direct answer to their importunate 
praying was neither unusual nor unexpected. The believers had assembled for the 
specific purpose of producing a miracle in the spiritual world, and not for the 
purpose of producing a phenomenon in the natural world. We do not need a 
manifestation of the supernatural to arrest the attention of a pleasure seeking 
world. God does not often shake the shackles off His imprisoned saints, and open 
the doors of the jail with an earthquake. He can do the unusual and the 
unexpected when necessary. We do not need the Lord to do something to astonish 
us, but we do need Him to do something to alert us to our dangers.

We cannot ignore the fact that we desperately need a startling manifestation of 
God to shake us out of our spiritual lethargy and selfish complacency. We cannot 
substitute a program for power and have the least semblance of hope that the 
unsaved will be attracted by it.

The believers were praying in a desperate crisis when they said, ". . . Lord, 
behold their threatenings . . ." We are aware that some of the most enduring 
results recorded in sacred history were obtained when some devout person prayed 
in an hour of crisis. Abraham prevailed with God in prayer when the angelic 
messengers told him about the destruction of Sodom. The holy Scriptures reveal 
that Moses prayed importunately for the people when they incurred the fierce 
anger of God by worshipping the golden calf. It was a critical time in Israel 
when Elijah prayed earnestly on Mount Carmel. Jesus was praying in an hour of 
crisis when He said, ". . . Father, the hour is come . . ." The believers were 
confronted by a desperate situation when they said, ". . . Lord, behold their 
threatenings . . ." With them, it was a case of life or death, victory or 
defeat. The odds against them were tremendous, but the God that was for them was 
Almighty.

There is nothing in the sacred records to show that they had the slightest 
intention of compromising the truth in order to have favor with men. They did 
not call a meeting of the official board to discuss ways and means of evading 
the fundamental issues involved. They did not take refuge in a stupefying 
pessimism saying that nothing could be done to remedy the situation confronting 
them. Neither did they deceive themselves by saying that things would work out 
satisfactorily to all parties concerned. They were willing to accept the 
conflict that challenged their faith and hope in God. They did the most natural 
thing in the sight of the Lord when they assembled together with one accord in 
prayer, and lifted up their voice in one concerted petition to Him for help.

The believers in this day of grace should be impressed by the victory achieved 
by this praying company of saints. There are many things which threaten us 
today. We are confronted with serious situations that cannot be overcome unless 
we keep our strength renewed through prevailing prayer.

It is written, ". . . They were all filled with the Holy Ghost, and they spake 
the word of God with boldness." A gracious infilling with the Spirit of God is 
the only solution for our spiritual difficulties in this age of the world. The 
Lord's holy prophet said,

". . . When the enemy shall come in like a flood, the Spirit of the Lord shall 
lift up a standard against him." -- Isa. 59:19

We cannot hope to escape the flood of evil which threatens to overwhelm the 
believers today unless we are constantly refilled and re-invigorated by the Holy 
Spirit. When Paul said, ". . . Be filled with the Spirit," he was stressing the 
necessity of continuing in the fullness of the Spirit in order to achieve the 
victory for Christ in this world. This remarkable filling with the Spirit was 
evidently different in some respects from the epochal filling received on the 
day of Pentecost. This gracious enablement of the Spirit was obviously one of 
the times of refreshing to be expected from the presence of the Lord. 
(Acts 3:19.)

Unless the believers in the church today have their spiritual strength 
replenished repeatedly by the Spirit they will not be able to overcome the 
increasing power of spiritual wickedness threatening them today. The church 
cannot cope with the menacing threat of worldliness except the company of 
believers pray for power to meet the insidious threat. The company of believers 
cannot withstand the subversive teachings of modern Liberalism unless they pray 
for strength to contend for the faith once delivered to the saints.

It will require much prayer to prevail against the creeping paralysis resulting 
from meaningless programs and pointless plays promoted by the worldly-minded 
leaders in the church. Unless the company of believers today are girded with the 
power of the Holy Spirit they will not be able to cope with the crisis 
confronting them in this day of formality and unbelief. God did not answer their 
impassioned prayer in the hour of crisis by miraculously changing the attitude 
of the determined opposition. He did not remove the threat which endangered 
them, neither did He destroy the ring-leaders responsible for the persecution of 
the church. It is interesting to note that the company of believers did not ask 
the Lord to change the attitude of their enemies. They accepted the fact that 
such persecution had been foreseen and foretold.

". . . Thy servant David hast said, Why did the heathen rage, and the people 
imagine vain things? The kings of the earth stood up, and the rulers were 
gathered together against the Lord, and against his Christ." -- Acts 4:25. 
(Psalm 2:1-3)

The Lord would have us understand that suffering persecution for His sake is the 
price to be paid in blood and tears for the unspeakable pleasure of serving Him 
in the holy way of life.

Our young people should be impressed with the fact that they cannot expect the 
Lord to change the attitude of their unsaved friends and associates. When once 
the young converts discover this truth they will not find it difficult to 
overcome the hardships of life. Pastors find it difficult to get the young 
people established in the faith because they apparently believe that God should 
change their environment in answer to prayer. It is apparently difficult for 
them to understand that a change in their surroundings is not the solution of 
their spiritual problem. It is likewise true that a change in the moral 
conditions which environ the church today is not the solution of its spiritual 
problem.

The company of believers found the solution of their problem when they lifted up 
their voice with one accord in prayer to God. The answer they received enabled 
them to cope with the rising tide of spiritual wickedness in high places. The 
Lord fortified them with a spiritual power that no combination of evil forces 
could withstand successfully.

The embattled believers were praying with an unwavering faith when they said, 
"Lord, thou art God." The indisputable fact of God was the basis of the 
unshakable confidence which inspired them to pray. It is remarkable how impotent 
and insignificant the feeble efforts of wicked men appear when we realize that 
God is our refuge and strength, a very present help in trouble. (Psalm 46:1.)

The imperishable Word declares,

"The Lord is on my side; I will not fear: what can man do unto me?" -- Psa. 
118:6

God gave us a certified promise when He said, "I will never leave thee, nor 
forsake thee." The Lord has never deserted His faithful people in the time of 
conflict. We need to have this blessed truth imbedded in our consciousness, 
impressed on our minds, and indelibly inscribed in our hearts by the hand of 
God. When once we grasp the fact of God it is not difficult to pray.

God's everlasting kingdom will never be destroyed by the combined forces of the 
ungodly. Almighty God is never in jeopardy. He has no fear of mortal man. He 
shall remain immutable in purpose and invincible in power for evermore.

Consider what the praying company said about God's enemies,

"For of a truth against thy holy child Jesus, whom thou hast anointed, both 
Herod, and Pontius Pilate, with the Gentiles, and the people of Israel, were 
gathered together, For to do whatsoever thy hand and thy counsel determined 
before to be done." -- Acts 4:27, 28

The conscienceless Herod, and the cowardly Pontius Pilate are dead, and their 
vicious opposition to Christ is dead and buried in the sepulcher of the ages. 
The aggressive agnosticism and sneering atheism that ran rampant less than a 
century ago has ceased to occupy a prominent place in the world today. The 
vicious Liberalism which afflicts the church today will soon be dead, buried 
together with modern infidels who have advocated its pernicious views.

Perhaps the sands have been washed in the footprints of the Stranger of Galilee, 
but the world has not forgotten that He lived, loved, and labored to save lost 
humanity from eternal death. The countless centuries which have hurried into the 
dateless past have not impaired His strength to save us to the uttermost. The 
marching millenniums will not erase His matchless Name from the annals of sacred 
history. The last desolate day of time will not find Him buried in the sepulcher 
of the ages. The fleeing ghost of eternity will never discover the grave of God. 
Of Him it is written,

"And, Thou, Lord, in the beginning hast laid the foundation of the earth; and 
the heavens are the works of thine hands: They shall perish; but thou remainest; 
and they all shall wax old as doth a garment; And as a vesture shalt thou fold 
them up, and they shall be changed: but thou art the same, and thy years shall 
not fail." -- Heb. 1:10-12.

When we fortify our faith and underscore our thinking with the words, "Lord, 
thou art God," we can prevail in prayer and overcome the combined forces of evil 
which threaten us in these trying times. Almighty God will not abandon His 
eternal purpose because a few wicked men have lifted up their voices against 
Him. Our God has assured us that all things work together for good to them that 
love Him, to them who are the called according to His purpose. His imperishable 
promises give a strong consolation to lay hold of the hope set before us. Let us 
hold fast the profession of our faith without wavering; for He is faithful that 
promised.

The assembled company prayed that the messengers of the Word might have courage. 
They said,

". . . Grant unto thy servants, that with all boldness they may speak thy word." 
-- Acts 4:29

The voice of prayer was heard in heaven and the answer granted when the 
assembled company of devout saints prayed this importunate prayer in the time of 
crisis. God's people were not praying for boldness because they were moral 
cowards. They were fearfully aware of the danger which threatened them; but they 
were not too cowardly to face it with God's help.

The rulers of the people, and the elders in Israel had called Peter and John 
before the council, and commanded them not to speak at all nor teach in the name 
of Jesus. (Acts 4:18.) God's called servants could not heed this diabolical 
command and be faithful to the high calling of God in Christ Jesus. To comply 
with such an unjust demand, not to speak at all nor teach in the Name of Jesus, 
one must compromise the truth of Christ, and cease to emphasize the central 
theme of the Gospel message. The very essence of the Gospel is contained in the 
Name of Jesus.

It is interesting to notice that the believers were praying for the message of 
divine truth. They said, "With all boldness they may speak thy word." The 
emphasis is placed on "Thy word." The Christians wanted to hear God's Word 
declared with firm conviction and unwavering confidence. They evidently wanted 
to be edified and enlightened by the message of saving truth. They obviously 
believed that the Gospel was the power of God unto salvation to every one that 
believed it. It is indeed blessed to discover a people who desire to hear the 
message of redeeming grace, a people who do not want to be entertained with 
cheap programs and silly plays in the church, a people hungry for the bread of 
life which Christ only can give.

The assembled believers prayed for the messengers of the Gospel, saying, "Grant 
unto thy servants." It is well to notice that the Christians said, "Thy 
servants." They evidently recognized that the apostles were the servants of God. 
They were not considered to be servants of an institution, or an organization. 
They considered the apostles to be the called servants of God, who had 
commissioned them to serve His redeemed family. These godly men were not hired 
promoters; they were Christ's holy messengers.

It does not require moral courage to promote a program to entertain a group of 
nominal Christians. Neither does it require courage to give a book review, or 
speak on current events; but it does require boldness to press the claims of 
Christ on men, and demand that they repent of their sins and yield themselves to 
Him.

It does not require spiritual fortitude to organize a campaign to raise money 
for the general interests of the church; but it does take much prayer and 
faithful preaching to precipitate a genuine revival of full salvation.

To raise these issues does not mean that one is indulging in hurtful criticism 
of God's faithful people and preachers. It does mean that one is gravely 
concerned about the praying of God's people, who are members of the body of 
Christ. It is apparent that a devout minister can perform his work for Christ 
more efficiently when he knows that the Christians want to hear the Word and are 
supporting him with their prayers and faith. The record shows that Peter and 
John had joined the company of saints in the fellowship of prayer. This fact 
discloses that the messengers of Christ realized the necessity of prevailing 
prayer.

It is not unusual to hear some ministers say they are so burdened with the work 
of the church that they have very little time to spend in earnest prayer. This 
is a startling admission for any man to make, especially a minister of the 
Gospel. It is a serious matter in the life of a preacher when he allows himself 
to be cumbered with much serving. The results of his neglect of prayer will be 
revealed by the poverty of his preaching. It is possible for a minister to 
become so preoccupied with his duties that he will give prayer a place of 
secondary importance in his life. God's servants should consider that nothing 
pertaining to the church of Christ is more important than waiting before the 
Lord in the secret place of prayer. The man of God loses his passion for souls 
when he willfully neglects to pray. He must wait until his soul is aflame with 
holy zeal, and his mind stimulated with fresh news from heaven. When he takes 
proper time to pray, his preaching will edify and enlighten the Christians, and 
the fruitfulness of his ministry will be increased.

The writer disclosed some remarkable results from this ministry of prayer when 
he said,

"And with great power gave the Apostles witness of the resurrection of the Lord 
Jesus: and great grace was upon them all." Acts 4 v. 33.

The assembled company prayed for miracles to be performed in the name of Jesus.

"By stretching forth thine hand to heal; and that signs and wonders may be done 
by the name of thy holy child Jesus." -- Acts 4 v. 30.

It is obvious that the Christians expected miracles to accompany the preaching 
of the Word. It is interesting to note that the prayer for boldness to speak the 
Word included the petition for healing, and signs and wonders. The order of the 
prayer places preaching the Word first before the performing of miracles in the 
name of Jesus.

Our Lord placed more emphasis on preaching and teaching than He did on His 
gracious ministry of healing the sick, and showing signs and wonders. However, 
we are not to conclude that such miracles cannot be performed through the power 
of prayer in this age and generation. The healing of the sick, and the signs and 
wonders performed in the name of Jesus accompany the preaching of the Word.

This fact is clearly observed when we give thoughtful attention to the import of 
the prayer. The prayer for miracles reveals the true concept regarding the power 
of Jesus to heal. They said, "By stretching forth thine hand to heal . . ." The 
presence of Jesus was so real to praying saints that they asked Him to stretch 
forth His nail-scarred hand and heal the people.

Jesus did stretch forth His hand and touched the diseased bodies of men, and 
they were instantly healed. The fact that Christ has ascended to heaven has not 
changed our concept of His Divine Person. He is willing and able to stretch 
forth His hand and heal our broken bodies today like He did in the days of His 
flesh.

I am persuaded to believe that the professing Christians would see more miracles 
of healings performed by the hand of Jesus if they would spend more time in 
earnest prayer for the messengers of the Gospel.

I am convinced that the Lord will work wonders in this age of indifference if we 
will cease to limit Him by unbelief, and accept the fact that miracles can be 
performed today by the outstretched hand of the Holy Child Jesus.





CHAPTER 8

THE INTERCESSORY PRAYERS OF CHRISTIANS

". . . Friend, lend me three loaves; for a friend of mine in his journey is come 
to me . . ." -- Luke 11:5, 6.

There is evidently a ministry of prayer even as there is a ministry of 
preaching. The teachings of Jesus contained in the parable show us that praying 
and preaching are integral parts of the plan of salvation.

Preaching is God's way of speaking to man, and praying is man's way of speaking 
to God. Preaching is God's way of appealing to the will of man, and praying is 
man's way of appealing to the will of God.

Our Lord's teachings relating to intercessory prayer are clearly revealed in the 
Epistles. John's Epistles reveal the amazing power made available to God's 
people through intercessory prayer. Peter assures us that the eyes of the Lord 
are over the righteous, and His ears are open unto their prayers. James said, 
". . . The prayer of faith shall save the sick, and the Lord shall raise him 
up . . ." The inspired writings of Paul disclose the astonishing possibilities 
in the ministry of intercessory prayer. In one of Paul's Epistles the ministry 
of prayer is connected so closely with the ministry of preaching that it is 
difficult to tell where the prayer ends and the preaching begins. 
(Colossians 1:9-17.)

Note the boundless possibilities revealed in the prayers of a faithful minister 
of Christ.

"Epaphras, who is one of you, a servant of Christ, saluteth you, always 
labouring fervently for you in prayers, that ye may stand perfect and complete 
in all the will of God." -- Col. 4:12.

It is obvious that the fervent prayers of a servant of Christ can enable the 
believers to stand perfect and complete in all the will of God. Perhaps it is 
difficult for us to understand how our praying for the children of God can 
establish them in the faith, nevertheless it is true according to this 
Scripture. We are convinced that our fervent prayers can obtain power from the 
throne of grace to preserve some struggling saint in an hour of severe trial.

The man said, ". . . A friend of mine in his journey is come to me . . ." Our 
Lord focused attention on the responsibility to pray for others when He uttered 
the stirring words in this parable. It obviously was not the man's own personal 
need that compelled him to request the three loaves; it was the imperative need 
of the tired traveler that moved him to ask for bread at midnight.

No man can be a faithful follower of Christ and not recognize his responsibility 
to pray for others. The spiritual life received from Christ motivates a 
Christian to present the needs of others at the throne of grace, where mercy is 
obtained, and the promised grace is found to help others in a time of urgent 
need.

Our personal responsibility to intercede for others is made more apparent when 
we emphasize the words, ". . . Is come to me . . ." What strange combination of 
circumstances caused the man to seek help from his friend?

Perhaps he had taken the wrong road in the confusing darkness of the night. We 
are aware that the parable does teach the disturbing truth that men are lost in 
the darkness of sin, and that it is our duty to lead them to Christ. But the 
pitiful plight of the pilgrim is not the only startling truth contained in our 
Lord's teachings.

The statement, ". . . A friend of mine in his journey. . . ," persuades one to 
think that the traveler knew before he started on his journey that he could find 
rest and comfort in the home of his friend. It was his faith in his friend's 
reputation for hospitality that encouraged him to continue on his journey 
through the enveloping darkness of the night.

The parable reveals that men will come to us when they are convinced of our 
ability to obtain help for them through intercessory prayer. The news that a 
certain man can prevail with God in prayer will soon reach a multitude of 
hopeless and helpless people. Some distressed soul will soon be knocking at the 
man's door seeking help and comfort.

It was the good news that Christ was giving help and comfort to all men that 
caused the multitudes to seek Him day and night. The disciples had a boldness in 
their preaching and a power in their praying that drew broken and burdened 
humanity to seek the Saviour.

Paul expressed his thanks to God for the church when he said,

". . . From you sounded out the word of the Lord not only in Macedonia and 
Achaia, but also in every place your faith to God-ward is spread abroad; so that 
we need not to speak any thing." -- 1 Thess. 1:8.

Lost men do not seek Christ by mere chance; He draws them unto Himself through 
the convicting and convincing power of the Holy Ghost. The Spirit performs His 
office work in the world through Christ's witnesses. Jesus said,

". . . The Spirit of truth, which proceedeth from the Father, he shall testify 
of me: And ye also shall bear witness, because ye have been with me from the 
beginning." -- John 15:26, 27

It is obvious that the Spirit enables the Christians to attract lost men by 
faithfully witnessing to the Saviour. Our Lord has not commissioned all of His 
people to preach, but He called all of them to pray.

The great revivals born in the hours of agonizing prayer attracted the attention 
of the civilized world. People came for the express purpose of obtaining 
spiritual help through the preaching and praying of God's servants. The great 
revival that began at Asbury College in 1950 was born in seasons of importunate 
praying. Some of the students prayed all night for a great spiritual awakening. 
Many of the teachers prayed earnestly for a gracious visitation of God. My own 
soul was in great agony of prayer. The burden was so great that I confessed the 
sins of the world to God. In some peculiar manner I had been made aware of the 
condemnation that rested on the souls of lost men.

During the Chapel service I exhorted the students to seek the Lord. I realized 
that it was God's appointed hour to answer prayer. At that moment the Holy Ghost 
moved mightily on the entire student body. Wave after wave of deep conviction 
swept over the audience. Many were moved to seek the Lord with diligence. It was 
an hour of triumph for the faithful few who had tarried through long seasons of 
intercessory prayer before the Lord during the quiet hours of the morning. The 
news of this marvelous visitation of God spread all over the nation. It was 
broadcast by radio to several foreign countries. People came hundreds of miles 
to receive spiritual help. Perhaps more than five thousand people were directly 
influence by this glorious spiritual awakening born in the hours of intercessory 
prayer.

I am thoroughly convinced that a great spiritual awakening will come to this 
benighted world if the people of God will deny themselves of sleep and seek God 
in the peaceful hours of the morning. It is my firm conviction that the great 
Asbury revival set the pattern to be followed in order to have a great revival 
in this day and age of the world. God will hear His people when they see the 
importance of praying for others. Our Lord revealed this fact when He said, 
"Because of his importunity he will rise and give him as many as he needeth." 
The man's plea for bread was so insistent that he did not heed the protest of 
his sleepy friend. The need of the traveler who had come to him out of the night 
was more important than the rest needed by his friend's entire family.

Is it possible that we are too indolent and indifferent to pray? Is there no 
passion for souls? Is there no sincere concern for the lost? Can it be that we 
are too sleepy to watch with Christ in the Gethsemane of prevailing prayer? Are 
our physical comforts more important than our praying for others?

Perhaps our Lord will draw some weary wayfarers to our door asking for help 
through our intercessory prayers. If He is pleased to trust us with such a 
responsibility, let us not fail to feed the famishing soul.

The man made an amazing confession when he said to his friend, ". . . I have 
nothing to set before him." It is evident that Jesus is not calling attention to 
the man's embarrassing poverty. He is showing us that our sufficiency is not of 
ourselves. Paul stated this fact when he said.

"Not that we are sufficient of ourselves to think any thing as of ourselves; but 
our sufficiency is of God." -- 2 Cor. 3:5.

We are woefully wanting in natural ability to help others spiritually; we have 
nothing to set before them. Unless we avail ourselves of the abundant resources 
of Christ through prayer, we will never have anything of spiritual worth to set 
before a starving world.

It is not difficult to imagine that the man had an easy chair and a comfortable 
bed to offer the tired traveler. But furniture is not a substitute for food. The 
welcome at the door, the furnishing of the house, and the entertaining 
conversation, cannot satisfy the hunger of the human heart. It requires the 
bread of life obtained from God to save a famishing soul from death.

Jesus encouraged us to avail ourselves of His resources when He said, ". . . He 
will rise and give him as many as he needeth." We have nothing of ourselves to 
save a lost soul, but we have a faithful Friend, who will give us as much as we 
request in intercessory prayer.

Jesus would have us understand that our importunate praying can overcome our 
discouragements and difficulties. He disclosed this fact when He said, ". . . He 
from within shall answer and say, Trouble me not: the door is now shut, and my 
children are with me in bed; I cannot rise and give thee." He is not saying that 
our heavenly Father is unwilling to grant our requests for others. The Master is 
teaching us not to cease praying when we encounter some opposing forces in life. 
There are times when it seems that our earnest requests have been denied. Let us 
keep in mind that our heavenly Father is willing to give the bread of life in 
answer to our intercessory petitions for others.





CHAPTER 9

THE THREE ESSENTIALS OF PRAYER

". . . Every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him 
that knocketh it shall be opened." -- Luke 11:10.

The plain teachings of Jesus accord us a valid reason to believe that every 
sincere prayer offered by His people shall be answered.

Jesus stated the three essentials of prayer when He said, "Ask, seek, knock." He 
disclosed these three essentials of prayer in His parable about the man asking 
his friend for three loaves. It is quite obvious that he was asking, seeking and 
knocking when he made his request for bread in the middle of the night.

The Master's words revealing the inherent principles of effectual praying 
confirm our faith, enlarge our understanding, and enable us to appropriate His 
certified promises. It is apparent that His promises relating to prayer are as 
vast in scope as the extent of His promises pertaining to salvation. It is 
written,

"He that spared not his own Son, but delivered him up for us all, how shall he 
not with him also freely give us all things." -- Rom. 8:32.

This Scripture reveals the possibilities of prayer to be as great as the 
boundless measure of redemptive grace. The unsparing God places no limit on our 
praying because there is no limit placed on His giving. If we believe that 
Christ was sacrificed to save us to the uttermost, we must likewise believe that 
He is able to supply our needs to the uttermost.

The lamentable fact is we have been exceedingly slow to comprehend the unlimited 
possibilities of prayer revealed in Christ's plain words. When we fully 
understand His instructions about praying, and grasp the promises by faith, we 
will not find it difficult to pray the effectual fervent prayer of achieving 
faith. We certainly owe it to ourselves and to all men, to consider seriously 
the fundamental principles of prayer disclosed to His disciples in answer to 
their request, ". . . Lord teach us to pray . . ." The very essence of this 
request is in itself a prayer to know how to pray.

It is necessary to consider Christ's teachings regarding our daily bread in 
order to understand the three essentials of prayer. He has focused our attention 
on the requests for bread in His entire discourse on prayer. Our daily bread is 
contained in the first direct request revealed in the Lord's prayer, "Give us 
day by day our daily bread." The request for bread follows the prayer of 
worship. ". . . Hallowed be thy name. Thy kingdom come. Thy will be done . . ." 
The request for bread also precedes the prayer for pardon and preservation. 
Bread is obviously the central theme of the Lord's prayer, according to the 
teachings of Jesus.

Our Lord emphasizes the need of bread in the parable of the man seeking the 
three loaves at midnight, and concludes His discourse by arresting our attention 
to the son asking bread of his father.

It is apparent that Christ's teachings about asking for bread contain something 
much more important than our temporal needs in this life. He evidently intended 
to stress the fact that we needed spiritual food in order to live in time and in 
eternity. We recall that Jesus astonished His disciples when He said, "I am the 
bread of life." When He uttered these words He made it clear that we cannot live 
without Him, for He is as essential to spiritual life as bread is essential to 
physical life. (See John 6:48-58.)

The three essentials of prayer are readily understood when applied to the 
Saviour, who is the living bread from heaven. When we sincerely ask for the Lord 
Jesus, we shall receive Him; when we earnestly seek Him, we shall find Him; and 
when we knock at His door, it shall be opened unto us.

The three fundamental principles of prayer apply to the entire scope of life in 
this world, and in the world to come. I am thoroughly convinced that the 
redeemed family of God will ask, seek, and knock in prayer throughout all 
eternity. Their request will not be hindered by their infirmities of body and 
mind as they are in this world. We are daily aware of the fact that we know not 
what we should pray for as we ought. We will be able to make our requests known 
unto God in that holy place with a clear mind and a glorified body.

It is quite evident that our Lord would have us understand this startling fact 
seeing that He made the request for bread the central theme of family life. It 
is certainly true that as long as we live in the Father's house we must depend 
on Him to sustain us. There is no valid reason to believe that this relationship 
shall end when we enter heaven. There is nothing in the Master's teachings to 
show us that we ever become self-sustaining in life, either in this world or in 
the world to come.

I am fully persuaded that the fundamental principle of asking and giving will 
continue to all eternity. God stated this fundamental rule of His household when 
He said to the Son,

"Ask of me, and I shall give thee . . ." -- Psa. 2:8.

This astonishing principle of asking and giving was clearly an integral part of 
the Saviour's ministry on earth. We find the same basic principle revealed in 
the amazing fact that He ever lives to make intercession for us.

The three essential principles of prayer are revealed in nature. Every living 
thing in creation must be fed. Every plant, insect, and living creature on earth 
must ask, seek, and knock in order to obtain food from nature. We accept this 
obvious fact without question.

We have no reason to believe that eternal life in heaven will be sustained 
independent of our relationship to Christ. He supplies our needs in this world 
in answer to prayer, and He shall continue to supply our eternal requirements in 
answer to prayer. If this is the rule of the Father's household on earth, it 
will continue to be the rule for ever.





CHAPTER 10

ASKING AND RECEIVING

". . . Every one that asketh receiveth . . ." -- Luke 11:10.

When our Lord uttered these immortal words He gave to every child of God the 
inalienable right to pray. He impressed His disciples with this fact by asking 
them some pertinent questions:

"If a son shall ask bread of any of you that is a father, will he give him a 
stone? or if he ask a fish, will he for a fish give him a serpent? Or if he 
shall ask an egg, will he offer him a scorpion? If ye then, being evil, know how 
to give good gifts unto your children: how much more shall your heavenly Father 
give the Holy Spirit to them that ask him?" -- v. 11-13.

If the father loves his son it would be utterly inconsistent with his nature to 
give his child a stone, or a snake, or a stinging scorpion instead of bread. The 
father's answer to his son's request will be granted according to the measure of 
his love for his child. It is the most natural thing in all the world for a 
father to listen to the requests of his family. When Jesus said, ". . . Any of 
you that is a father," he compares a man's love for his children to God's love 
for His children. He asks us to look up from our earthly fathers, and calculate 
how much more the heavenly Father will be moved to give good gifts to His 
children. Jesus is teaching us to understand that as much as God's goodness 
exceeds the goodness of mortal man, so much greater is our assurance that He 
will grant our childlike petitions.

Every child of God from the youngest to the oldest has a right to ask the Father 
for the bread of life. Every child, irrespective of age, sex, or race, can come 
boldly to the throne of grace, and find grace to help in time of need. There are 
no underprivileged children in God's family. The crippled, the weak, and the 
sick children have a right to ask the heavenly Father for the living bread from 
heaven.

The Saviour would have us perceive the imperishable truth that, ". . . Every one 
that asketh receiveth . . ." It is utterly unthinkable that our loving Father 
would ignore our earnest petitions. He will not remain silent and unmoved when 
His own children are weeping before Him in earnest petitions.

A missionary was telling about the sufferings endured while a prisoner during 
the war. He said that the crying of his starving family caused him to suffer 
more than all the cruel and barbarous treatment received at the hands of the 
savage and inhuman guards. When we understand how this godly man was moved by 
the constant crying of his famishing family, we can comprehend how our heavenly 
Father can be moved to answer the unceasing prayers of His family. It was not 
possible for the faithful missionary to grant the urgent requests of his 
children, but it is possible for our heavenly Father to grant the requests of 
His children.

Jesus teaches us that prayer has a human side and a divine side. The human side 
is the asking, and the divine side is the giving. The two halves which make up 
the whole of prayer are the asking and the receiving. Our asking and the 
Father's answering belong to each other. Our requests on earth and the Father's 
answer in heaven are meant for each other. If we believe that the Father has 
made an ample provision for the needs of His children, then we must also believe 
that He will surely give them all good gifts according to the promise.

Jesus teaches us to come to Him day by day to receive the bread of life to 
sustain us in this world. He wills day by day to do for us what we ask in simple 
faith.

When the Master said, ". . . Every one that asketh receiveth. . . ," He stressed 
the fact that we are not to rest without an answer to our petitions. He is 
saying that it is the Father's will, and the rule of His house to grant the 
requests of His believing children.

When no answer is received we are often disposed to say that it is not the will 
of God to give us the answer. We will find it much easier to yield to our own 
false reasoning about the answer to prayer than it is to shake off our lethargy 
and seek God until the answer is obtained. There are so many persons who rest 
content without the distinct experience of answered prayer. This distressing 
fact reveals the serious deterioration of Christian life in these last days. 
These unhappy souls pray daily, they ask many things, and devoutly hope that 
some of their prayers will be answered. They apparently do not know that it is 
the norm of spiritual life to receive definite answers to prayer. They obviously 
do not know that the heavenly Father wills day by day to do for us what we ask 
in faith.

We must take the words of Jesus just as they were spoken. We must not allow 
human reasoning to weaken the force of His teachings about our asking and 
receiving. We owe it to ourselves to take sufficient time while praying, to 
listen to His voice, and believe the truth that "Every one that asketh 
receiveth."

We should not make our many failures of the past the measure of our faith for 
the present. We must hold fast the assuring fact that the effectual fervent 
prayer of God's obedient child availeth much.

The son's request for bread is based on his relationship to the father. It is by 
virtue of this relationship that the son has the inalienable right to expect his 
father to answer his requests. When Jesus speaks of the son asking bread of his 
father, He is speaking of an obedient son. The son that finds no pleasure in 
obedience to his father and presumes that he can still ask and receive what he 
desires will certainly be disappointed. A son who loves and honors his father 
will find it is the father's good pleasure to answer his daily requests.

Consistent living on the part of God's people is the condition for obtaining the 
answer to prayer. God's precepts requiring obedience in our living, and His 
promises relating to our praying are inseparable.

We can certainly count on God's fulfilling His promise to answer prayer when we 
obey His sovereign will in all things. We should take time to meditate on the 
tenderness and love the heavenly Father has for His obedient children.

Much of our difficulty in praying is removed when we think on the happy 
relationship existing between an obedient child and a loving heavenly Father. 
When He sees His child with sincere purpose and steady will seeking diligently 
in everything to be and live as a child, then our prayers will prevail with Him 
as the prayer of an obedient child.

It requires considerable time to comprehend fully the teachings of Jesus 
regarding the inherent principles of effectual praying. If God's people will 
take sufficient time to meditate on the essentials of prevailing prayer, they 
will be rewarded richly for the hours spent in the school of Christ. When once 
we grasp the gracious truth contained in the words of Jesus, and take a firm 
hold on the promises relating to prayer, we will then realize the meaning of His 
words, ". . . Every one that asketh receiveth." We firmly believe that the 
Master stated the truth when He said, ". . . Every one that asketh 
receiveth . . ." Nevertheless we are confronted frequently with the startling 
and disconcerting fact that we do not always receive definite answer to our 
prayers. We find it exceedingly difficult to reconcile these disturbing facts 
with the explicit statement of Jesus regarding the answer to our prayers.

When we consider the Master's teachings about prayer, we must not strive to make 
them conform to our wishful thinking regarding the answer to our prayers. It is 
possible for us to set our heart on obtaining something we greatly desire for 
our own personal gratification, and then express our keen disappointment because 
the request was not granted.

The answer to our perplexing questions about prayer will be found when we study 
the Master's words about the son asking for bread. We are fully aware that the 
son cannot live without bread; he must have it or perish. However, there are 
many things the son may ask which are not as important to life as food. He may 
ask his father for money, or fine clothing, or toys. The father may consider it 
wise to give his son these good gifts; and again he might deem it best for the 
son's own good to withhold these things requested; but when the child asks for 
food it is a different matter of life, because food is a necessity.

There are many good gifts which our heavenly Father may deem it wise to bestow 
upon us, such as good health, prosperity, and financial security. If He wills to 
withhold these things we must submit to His sovereign will without complaint. 
Perfect health, prosperity, and earthly goods are not essential to life in this 
world. Our relationship to God does not depend on these creature comforts. These 
things cannot impart to us the moral strength we need to cope with the trials 
incident to life in this evil world. It requires the "Bread of life" to give the 
spiritual strength to sustain us in these last days. We are fully assured that 
our Father will give us the living bread from heaven to keep us strong in faith, 
undaunted in courage, and invincible in hope.

The grand climax of our Lord's discourse on prayer was reached when He disclosed 
the Father's promise to give the Holy Spirit to His praying children. He would 
have us understand that our urgent requests for the bread from heaven are 
answered by the Father's gift of the Spirit.

He is teaching us that the Spirit is given to the children of God for the 
express purpose of sustaining and satisfying life. Our incessant demands for 
spiritual food are supplied by the indwelling Spirit. Our daily prayer should 
be, "Lord, evermore give us this bread." The answer from heaven is, ". . . Every 
one that asketh receiveth . . ."





CHAPTER 11

SEEKING AND FINDING

". . . He that seeketh findeth." -- Luke 11:10

When Jesus said, "He that seeketh findeth . . . ," He disclosed the second 
fundamental principle of prevailing prayer. His immortal words assure us that we 
can make some important discoveries through prayer.

His brief statement presents the greatest challenge known to mortal man. His 
teachings about prayer are a direct challenge to our profession of faith. If we 
believe that Christ is the way, the truth, and the life, we must believe that 
some very important discoveries can be made regarding these essential facts 
about Him.

It is astonishing what men will do when inspired and motivated by the hope of 
finding the things of earth they so ardently desire. They sail uncharted seas, 
endure the scorching heat of the desert, scale the ice-covered mountains, and 
brave the dangers of a trackless wilderness in hope of discovering the things 
they diligently seek.

It does not require a chart, or compass, or costly equipment to find the things 
of God. We have no stormy seas to sail, no blistering sands to cross, no 
snow-clad mountains to scale, and no pathless wastes to encounter in our efforts 
to find the things we seek from God. We are not haunted day and night by the 
tormenting fears that we will not obtain the answer to our sincere petitions. We 
have not the slightest reason to doubt the validity of Christ's statement, 
". . . He that seeketh findeth . . ." Our faith to seek the things of Christ is 
based on His integrity and veracity.

When Jesus said, "Seek, and ye shall find . . . ," He was evidently speaking 
about finding the possessions of our heavenly Father. We are assured that His 
provision is as great as the manifold needs of His children. The weary can seek 
and find rest. The weak can seek and find strength. The sick can seek and find 
health. The Father wills to grant the various requests of His praying and 
trusting children.

When Jesus revealed the Father's promise to give the Holy Spirit in answer to 
prayer, He obviously intended to impress His trusting children with the fact 
that the Spirit would enable them to seek and find the treasures of truth. He 
later confirmed this remarkable fact regarding the ministry of the Spirit, 
saying,

". . . When he, the Spirit of truth, is come, he will guide you into all 
truth . . ." -- John 16:13.

We do not discover the things of God by mere chance; neither can we find them by 
a process of human reasoning. The things of God are revealed unto us by His 
Spirit. The Word declares,

". . . Eye hath not seen, nor ear heard, neither have entered into the heart of 
man, the things which God hath prepared for them that love him. But God hath 
revealed them unto us by his Spirit: for the Spirit searcheth all things, yea, 
the deep things of God." -- 1 Cor. 2:9, 10.

Prayer is like the telescope that enables a man to discover remote stars, 
blazing suns and whirling worlds in outer space. We may think of prayer as a 
microscope which enables a man to look into the realm of small things.

The Holy Spirit makes visible the invisible things of God. He enables us to pray 
so persistently that we can focus the light of Christ on the resources of God, 
and discover worlds, wealth, and wisdom unknown and unseen by the natural man. 
The inspired Apostle said,

". . .We look not at the things which are seen, but at the things which are not 
seen: for the things which are seen are temporal; but the things which are not 
seen are eternal." -- 2 Cor. 4:18.

We discover the eternal things of God in direct proportion to the measure of our 
seeking in prayer. The man who seeks diligently to know the things which God has 
prepared for them that love Him, will be rewarded by a greater measure of 
knowledge than the man who is casual and indifferent in his seeking.

It is necessary to deny ourselves of many things in order to seek and find the 
possessions of the Father revealed in His Son. The Apostle disclosed this truth 
when he said,

". . .What things were gain to me, those I counted loss for Christ. Yea 
doubtless, and I count all things but loss for the excellency of the knowledge 
of Christ Jesus my Lord . . ." -- Phil. 3: 7, 8.

It is impossible to obtain a more perfect knowledge of Christ until we count all 
things loss for Him. We must lay aside the things we count gain. To be aware of 
Christ in daily life is of greater value than all earthly knowledge to be 
obtained in this world. It is written,

". . . Ye shall seek me, and find me, when ye shall search for me with all your 
heart." -- Jer. 29:13.

We cannot comply with the conditions stated in this promise unless we divest 
ourselves of all cumbersome cares.

When Jesus gave us the parable about the son asking daily bread of his father, 
He fully intended to impress us with several salient facts about prayer. The 
fact that the son seeks and obtains the things provided by his father is not the 
only truth contained in the parable. A son worthy of such a loving father would 
consider him to be more than a generous provider; he would rejoice because of 
his father's presence with his family. The presence of the father means much to 
an innocent child in this passing world.

Jesus would have us understand that our heavenly Father is present with His 
family in this world. We know that our Father has provided good things for us, 
but He means more to us than a generous Provider. The fact that He is present 
with us at all times, and in all places fills our hearts with joy unspeakable 
and full of glory.

Philip expressed much in his brief prayer when he said to Jesus, ". . . Shew us 
the Father, and it sufficeth us." When this faithful disciple made this request, 
he voiced the deepest longings of the human heart. We cannot be satisfied in 
this distressed earth without a clear revelation of our heavenly Father. Philip 
did not ask for the impossible when he made his importunate plea to Jesus. 
Perhaps he had heard Jesus say, ". . . He that seeketh findeth . . ." The 
Saviour answered Philip's request when He said, ". . . He that hath seen me hath 
seen the Father . . ."

If the Father revealed Himself in His Beloved Son in that distant day, we can 
expect Him to reveal Himself in His Son in this day. Our need is as great as the 
need of the pleading disciple. When Jesus said, ". . . He that seeketh 
findeth . . .," He had no intention of leaving us confused and in doubt 
concerning the things to be discovered through prayer.

The Master's word affords us a valid reason to expect the Father to reveal 
Himself to us in His Son. This is obviously the truth He would have us see in 
the parable of the son asking bread. It is absolutely unthinkable that an 
intelligent child would not be aware that his father was present when he asked 
him for daily bread. It is likewise contrary to truth to suppose that the 
child's father would be pleased to remain unknown and unseen by his family.

God's infallible Word reveals that He did manifest Himself to His people in the 
ages past. If the dateless past is the only time God has revealed Himself, then 
we in this dispensation of grace have no truth to substantiate our claims that 
Christ was raised from the dead, and showed Himself alive by many infallible 
proofs.

We cannot persuade ourselves to believe that Christ has clothed Himself with 
perpetual silence, and cannot and will not reveal Himself to His people. If a 
seeking soul cannot be as fully aware of Christ's presence as a child is aware 
of his father's presence, then the Master's words are utterly meaningless. When 
Jesus said, ". . . He that seeketh findeth . . . ," He banished for ever our 
bewildering doubt and confusion of mind concerning the reality of the heavenly 
Father's abiding presence with His happy family.

If our minds fail to grasp the import of the Saviour's teachings about prayer, 
we should wait patiently before Him in humble submission and quiet meditation 
until our minds are clear and our faith strong. The prayer of faith can obtain 
the substance of things hoped for, and make real to us the evidence of things 
not seen by the natural eye.

It is not unusual to find reliable witnesses who will testify that Jesus has 
revealed Himself to them while they were devoutly seeking Him in prayer. These 
godly people are neither fanatics nor mystics. They consider the recurrent 
visitations of Jesus to be the norm of spiritual life.

During the peaceful hours of the early morning I was praying and waiting before 
the Saviour when He suddenly revealed Himself to me. I saw Him as clearly as 
anyone ever saw Him in the days of His flesh. I ceased to pray, and remained 
quiet and speechless in His Presence. The moments seemed too sacred for me to 
break the sweet silence by prayer. What could I have said to Him? Was He not the 
answer to all prayer?

I do not know how long He lingered with me on that memorable morning. I was not 
aware of the passing of time. To me, all time had ceased, and eternity had 
begun. No language can express my boundless joy and happy surprise when He stood 
before me. I shall never forget the beauty of His face and the glory of His 
garment. The glory radiating from His Person filled the room with a soft silent 
light. He spoke not a word to me. His attitude was as One who listens 
attentively when you speak. I realized as never before in my life that He wanted 
me to pray. My heart was immediately burdened to pray for a visitation of God. I 
humbled myself in His Presence and put my head between His feet and poured out 
my soul in the agony of intercessory prayer.

The vision of Jesus satisfied my heart and gave me perfect contentment of mind 
regarding His willingness to answer prayer. I realized that He was the end of 
all seeking and the answer to all problems of life. I bowed low before Him, and 
opened my inmost being to welcome Him as my Lord and Master. I devoutly 
worshipped Him in spirit and in truth. To this gladsome hour He is as real as 
the flesh of my body and the earth beneath my feet. I have never had one doubt 
regarding His presence.

Perhaps some will ask if there is a scriptural basis for believing that the 
Saviour will reveal Himself to His seeking people. I was confronted with this 
question after the Lord manifested Himself to me. Could it be that the vision 
was nothing more than the result of my wishful thinking? Was I a hopeless victim 
of an overwrought imagination? Was I suffering from a serious mental disorder? 
Was it a fanciful dream? These were some of the questions confronting me after 
the Lord had appeared in answer to my prayer of faith.

In my diligent search for truth, I recalled that the Saviour had said,

". . . He that loveth me shall be loved of my Father, and I will love him, and 
will manifest myself to him." -- John 14:21.

The gracious words glowed with a new light, and disclosed a new meaning to my 
rejoicing soul. His assuring words were all I needed to confirm my faith and 
answer my perplexing questions. I found many promises in the Scriptures, but 
this one promise was sufficient to satisfy my heart and mind.

Some of my friends firmly believe that I am sick. Certain others are greatly 
concerned about my mental condition. Perhaps some have devoutly prayed for my 
immediate healing. I am thankful for their earnest prayers.

I have often wondered how some persons interpret the Saviour's own promise to 
manifest Himself to them that love Him. I wonder if they believe that such an 
experience is possible in this present age. I am convinced that many do not 
believe that the Saviour's promise extends to anyone except the chosen 
disciples. They evidently consider all reliable testimony as being fantastic and 
fanatical.

If we allow ourselves to be hindered by the unbelief of this modern age we will 
surely fail to grasp the fact that frequent visitations of the Lord are to be 
expected in a normal Christian life.

When Jesus said, ". . . He that seeketh findeth . . . ," He intended to impress 
us with the fact that an obedient child of God would seek to please Him in all 
things pertaining to life. This truth is obviously revealed in the parable of 
the son asking bread. Surely the son would seek to please his father. A son 
worthy of the heavenly Father would seek to please Him in matters of life. The 
obedient son would also realize that the father was pleased with him. The 
perfect example of this is revealed in the Son of God. The Father witnessed to 
His pleasure in His Son when He said,

". . .This is my beloved Son, in whom I am well pleased." -- Matt. 3:17.

The Beloved Son witnessed to this truth when He said,

". . . The Father hath not left me alone; for I do always those things that 
please him." -- John 8:29.

We make the greatest discovery in life when we discover the secret of pleasing 
God. An obedient child of the Father that lives day by day with an awareness of 
His pleasure has found the pearl of great price.

Our human frailties and infirmities of body and mind will often hinder us in 
performing always those things which please our heavenly Father, but there is 
nothing in the world that prevents us from being a pleasure to Him if we are 
willing to obey Him in all things relating to life. We can be a pleasure to our 
Father long before we are able to understand how to do the things which are 
well-pleasing in His sight. The favor of God rests constantly on the people who 
believe Him and diligently seek Him. It is written,

". . . Without faith it is impossible to please him: for he that cometh to God 
must believe that he is, and that he is a rewarder of them that diligently seek 
him." -- Heb. 11:6.

When we obtain His approbation we have received the greatest reward known to 
mortal man. The earthly pleasures we leave behind when we come to the end of 
life's journey are not important, but the eternal pleasures received at the end 
of the way are worth all it costs to obtain them.





CHAPTER 12

THE KNOCKING THAT OBTAINS AN OPENING

". . . To him that knocketh it shall be opened." -- Luke 11:10

These words of the Master reveal the third fundamental principle of the 
effectual fervent prayer that availeth much.

The Master disclosed the value of praying persistently in His discourse about 
the man asking three loaves at midnight. There is something much more 
encouraging in His teachings about prayer than we find in the words of the 
reluctant neighbor, who said, ". . . Trouble me not: the door is now shut . . ." 
Our Lord would have us understand that the goodness of our heavenly Father far 
exceeds the goodness of the sleepy man. The Master is teaching us that we can 
prevail in prayer in spite of the discouragements and difficulties confronting 
us in life.

The bread so desperately needed to satisfy the hunger of the weary wayfarer was 
on the other side of the closed door. Much depended on the importunate pleading 
and insistent knocking on the part of the man seeking bread. If he had been 
discouraged by his friend's gruff words, ". . . Trouble me not . . . ," he would 
have gone away defeated and empty handed. If he had believed that his drowsy 
friend had spoken his final word when he said, ". . . The door is now 
shut . . . ," he would have departed with a deep sense of frustration and 
failure.

Our heavenly Father will never rebuff his praying children, saying, ". . . The 
door is now shut . . ." Jesus is teaching us to pray with unwavering faith and 
firm confidence. He inspired us with dauntless courage to pray persistently when 
He said, ". . . To him that knocketh it shall be opened."

The Saviour's heartening words imply that a vast realm of truth will be opened 
unto us when we knock at the door of the Father's house. It will enhance our 
understanding concerning the possibilities of prayer if we will devote some time 
to study what the Saviour has said about the open door set before His people.

Jesus identified Himself as being the door when He said,

"I am the door: by me if any man will enter in, he shall be saved, and shall go 
in and out, and find pasture." -- John 10:9

His astonishing words enable us to comprehend more completely the truth about 
prevailing prayer.

Christ is the door. He is the only entrance to God, and the only entrance to 
salvation. When we put Him in the promise regarding our persistent knocking in 
prayer we can perceive the truth. We can interpret the assuring promise as 
saying, "To him that knocketh, Christ, the Door, shall be opened." In other 
words, Christ will open Himself to us in answer to prayer. This is a blessed 
truth to contemplate. Christ opens His loving heart to His praying people. He 
opens His eternal hope to His praying people. He opens His enduring holiness to 
His praying people. He opens His invincible strength to His praying people. In 
the light of this Divine revelation, one is constrained to say,

"O the depth of the riches both of the wisdom and knowledge of God! how 
unsearchable are his judgments, and his ways past finding out!" -- Rom. 11:33.

It has pleased the Lord to open His immutable purpose to His faithful saints and 
enable them to see His ultimate triumph over sin and death. He opens the gates 
of eternal life, the greatness of enduring love, and the glory of His likeness 
to His praying family. Through prayer we can enter into the joys of an uttermost 
salvation and delight ourselves in the abundance of peace. Through prayer we can 
escape the snares of Satan, and elude the evil purposes of the foe.

Christ is both an entrance and an exit. We can pray our way into the blessed 
realities of spiritual life, and pray our way out of the bewildering problems of 
life. Our Lord revealed these gracious facts to us when He said, ". . . To him 
that knocketh it shall be opened."

When Jesus opens Himself to His praying people He opens eternity to them, for He 
fills eternity with Himself and contains eternity in Himself. He is the First 
Cause and the Final Conclusion of everything in time and in eternity. Our 
concept of Christ is enlarged when He opens to us. The Psalmist was fully aware 
of this marvelous truth when he said,

". . . Thou hast set my feet in a large room." -- Psa. 31:8.

Christ wills to open His Word to us in answer to prayer. He stated this fact 
when He said,

"I have given unto them the words which thou gavest me; and they have received 
them, and have known surely that I came out from thee, and they have believed 
that thou didst send me." -- John 17:8.

Perhaps my personal testimony will encourage others to pray that Christ will 
reveal His words to them. During the quiet hour of the morning I was asking the 
Saviour to enable me to understand His Word. For many years I had made it my 
practice to study the Scriptures, but I was aware that the Scriptures contained 
a depth of meaning that I had not perceived. I sincerely desired to understand 
the Word of God. I realized my need of an enlarged concept of the plan of 
salvation. It was the one prayer of my heart to know more about God's invincible 
Word in order to preach the message of life to a perishing world. I was 
convinced that the Lord had heard my sincere prayer. Not many days after the 
season of prayer, He began to unfold His Word of truth to my heart and mind with 
a depth of meaning I had never known.

I was teaching in Asbury College when the Lord began to reveal His Word to me. I 
listened to my own lecture with great interest. I said things about the Saviour 
that had not been prepared in my notes for the class. The light of Divine 
revelation flooding my soul was not the result of my reasoning. The truth about 
redemption did not come from my own mind; it was coming from the mind of Christ. 
My soul was enjoying great peace, and His living words were like fire in my 
spirit. I was constrained to tell others of the Saviour's love for lost 
humanity. To this happy hour His truth abides within my heart and mind. His 
Spirit continues to reveal the Words of Christ to me day by day. I can say with 
the Psalmist,

"As the hart panteth after the water brooks, so panteth my soul after thee, O 
God." -- Psa. 42:1.

God's imperishable truth will glow with a new light when we knock at His door in 
prayer. If we have failed to grasp the significance of Christ's plain teachings 
about prayer when He said, ". . . To him that knocketh it shall be opened," we 
should ask Him to open Himself to us. There is nothing more simple and 
understandable in life than knocking at a door. Even a little child can knock at 
a door.

Christ is the Door between the spiritual realm and the physical realm. When we 
are born of the Spirit we enter a spiritual kingdom, which is a spiritual realm. 
We live, move, and have our being in a spiritual realm with Christ. We are in 
the world physically, but we are not of the world spiritually. God's Word 
declares that a righteous person is like a tree. A tree lives in two realms of 
nature; it lives in the earth, and it lives above the earth. Paul recognized 
this amazing fact when he said,

"Set your affection on things above, not on things on the earth." -- Col. 3:2.

Jesus revealed an amazing truth when He said, "I am the door . . ." We can enter 
into His presence and pray before Him in the same simple manner that we can go 
into another room through an open door. When we discover this amazing truth, we 
find it possible to take others into His presence and talk with Him about their 
needs. It has been my pleasure to take others into the presence of Jesus many 
times. I saw the truth of these things when I entered into a covenant of prayer 
with Christ. I do not find it difficult to enter into His presence at anytime.

When Jesus said, ". . . To him that knocketh it shall be opened," He meant to 
show us that it is possible for His praying people to enter the heavenly place 
where He is seated on the mediatorial throne, and present their petitions to 
Him. This fact is substantiated by Paul, who said,

". . .Seek those things which are above, where Christ sitteth on the right hand 
of God." -- Col. 3:1.

The inspired prophet evidently perceived this wonderful truth concerning Christ 
when he said,

". . . He shall be for a glorious throne to his Father's house." -- Isa. 22:23.

God's children have a glorious throne in the Father's house. They have a perfect 
right to come boldly to the glorious throne of grace and make their requests 
known unto their heavenly Father.

Our Lord likewise disclosed a marvelous truth about the door when He said, 
". . . And shall go in and out, and find pasture." It is apparent that a saved 
man can go from one realm to another and find spiritual food. Jesus has made an 
ample provision to sustain His people in both the physical realm and the 
spiritual realm. He cares for His people in the natural world and in the 
spiritual world. The Saviour would have us understand that the Good Shepherd 
will care for His flock while they are out in the field, even as He cares for 
them when they are in the fold. In other words, the Saviour will preserve us 
while we work and witness for Him in the world, like He preserves us when we are 
resting safely in the fold of His love. It is written,

"The Lord shall preserve thy going out and thy coming in from this time forth, 
and even for evermore." -- Psa. 121:8.

The changeless Christ has spoken with absolute authority concerning the open 
door.

". . . Behold, I have set before thee an open door, and no man can shut it: for 
thou hast a little strength, and hast kept my word, and hast not denied my 
name." -- Rev. 3:8

". . . To him that knocketh it shall be opened."

It shall remain open to all eternity.





CHAPTER 13

THE IMMORTAL PRAYERS OF THE SAINTS

". . . Golden vials full of odours, which are the prayers of saints." -- Rev. 
5:8.

Christ frequently chooses some unusual place on earth to reveal Himself to 
mankind. It is obviously consistent with His Divine Nature and eternal purpose 
in redemption to disclose Himself in some unusual place and in some unexpected 
manner.

He revealed Himself to Moses in a burning bush in a desert. He revealed Himself 
to be the long expected Messiah to a woman of unsavory reputation at Jacob's 
well. He revealed a measure of His effulgent glory to three chosen disciples on 
a high mountain. He revealed Himself and His purpose to give the Gentiles the 
Gospel to Saul of Tarsus on the road to Damascus.

Perhaps the most amazing revelation ever given to mortal man was given to John 
when the Saviour revealed Himself clothed in His majesty and might standing in 
the midst of the seven churches. John said,

". . . When I saw him, I fell at his feet as dead. . . ." -- Rev. 1: 17.

Christ chose to reveal Himself to John while in exile on the lonely isle of 
Patmos. This holy disciple was banished to this wave-washed and wind-swept pile 
of shattered stones and shifting sands,

". . . For the word of God, and for the testimony of Jesus Christ." -- Rev. 1:9.

The Saviour selected this faithful man to be the human channel through which His 
sublime truth could be given to His trusting saints. It pleased the blessed Lord 
to reveal the sublime truth about prayer in John's picturesque language, ". . . 
Golden vials full of odours . . ."

Our Lord would evidently have us understand that prayer is a part of worship. It 
is like the odours of sweet incense ascending upward to God. The heavenly Father 
is pleased with our fervent prayers when we fill them with the fragrance of our 
sincere worship.

The Saviour would have us understand that our prayers are kept in golden vials 
in His Holy Place in heaven like the golden censer, and the ark of the covenant 
overlaid round about with gold, were kept in the most Holy Place in the temple.

Perhaps God's praying people have not fully grasped the fact that all sincere 
prayers are immortal, and the Lord preserves these prayers like a sweet incense 
kept in golden vials.

We surely are aware that Christ's prayers are living petitions preserved for us 
in His plan of eternal salvation. He breathed the power of His endless life into 
His prayers. His prayers are immortal because He is immortal. His prayers will 
be answered because He is the answer to all prayer.

The prayers recorded in the Holy Scriptures are an immortal part of the Divine 
plan of salvation. These petitions were made immortal by the power of the 
indwelling Holy Spirit. The Spirit enables God's people to pray with yearnings 
which cannot be uttered.

"And he that searcheth the hearts knoweth what is the mind of the Spirit, 
because he maketh intercession for the saints according to the will of God." -- 
Rom. 8:27.

It is clearly disclosed in this remarkable Scripture that every prayer empowered 
by the indwelling Spirit becomes an integral and immortal part of the entire 
economy of God as disclosed in the plan of redemption.

I am thoroughly convinced that every prayer offered according to the will of God 
shall be answered either in our lifetime on earth, or after we have entered our 
heavenly home. However, I cannot discover anything revealed in the Word of God 
to warrant anyone in believing that the translated saints can pray for persons 
living on the earth. Praying to the translated saints, and asking them to pray 
for us, is a modified form of idolatry. Jesus Christ is the only mediator 
between God and man. All prayers must be offered to Him, and in His Name only.

When I affirm that every prayer offered in the Name of Jesus shall be answered, 
I am not saying that God will overrule the human will in order to answer our 
prayers. He cannot and will not save any man against his will, but He will 
convict a man of sin against his will.

Perhaps an incident will disclose what I mean when I speak of an immortal 
prayer. One night during a camp meeting, a man came to the altar weeping with 
deep conviction for sin. After a season of earnest prayer, he was converted and 
gave a glowing testimony. His faithful father had preached for many years and 
had prayed often during those years for his unsaved son. He never lived to see 
his son saved, but on this particular night in the camp meeting, the loving Lord 
answered prayer and saved this erring son of the preacher.

It helps me to imagine that the Saviour called His sainted servant and said, "My 
child, I have many of your prayers in golden vials. They are like sweet odours 
poured out before Me. I have the prayers you offered for your erring son during 
your lifetime on earth. I am now ready to answer your prayers during the camp 
meeting where you preached My Gospel many years ago. My child, I have just now 
granted your son a pardon in answer to your prayers and prayers of My people." 
It encourages my heart to believe that God will answer every prayer.

While praying during the quiet hours of the morning in a hotel room some years 
ago, I was burdened to pray for a woman slowly dying with a cancer of the 
throat. She had been a successful missionary for many years and had returned 
home from the field broken in health, bitter and resentful in spirit. I knew her 
saintly mother during her lifetime, and I knew how she had prayed for her 
daughter.

While praying for this dying missionary, the Lord said to me, "I am ready and 
willing to answer a mother's prayer, and give her suffering daughter peace of 
heart and mind." I was so sure that the Lord had spoken to me about this dying 
woman, and about His willingness to answer her mother's prayers, that I wrote a 
letter urging certain women to go and pray with this suffering missionary. She 
found peace and comfort of heart and mind, and went home within a few weeks to 
be with her faithful Saviour and her rejoicing mother.

Many of the Lord's redeemed children will live and die without receiving the 
answers to many of their sincere prayers. When we live by faith and die in the 
faith, we can be assured that a Just and Holy God will not forget His certified 
promises regarding His willingness to answer the prayers offered in the Name of 
Jesus.

The ". . . golden vials full of odours, which are the prayers of the saints," 
shall be poured out before the mediatorial throne of Jesus some glorious day. 
When that gladsome hour shall arrive on the wings of time, we shall see the 
triumph of the tears we have shed in the hours of agonizing prayer. We shall see 
the Father glorified in the Son.

We are living in a passing world filled with fears and doubts; but we can live 
in this transient world and not be filled with its fears and doubts regarding 
the answer to our prayers. The inspired Psalmist said,

"Trust in him at all times; ye people, pour out your heart before him: God is a 
refuge for us." -- Psa. 62:8.

God's certified promises relating to prayer give us the inalienable right to 
say,

"Hear my cry, O God; attend unto my prayer. From the end of the earth will I cry 
unto thee, when my heart is overwhelmed: lead me to the rock that is higher than 
I." -- Psa. 61:1, 2.

The Scriptures encourage us to pray incessantly and importunately knowing within 
ourselves that God will answer our petitions in His own time, and according to 
His own will. Let us offer up prayers with strong crying and tears unto Him that 
is able to save to the uttermost. Let us pray without ceasing until the hour 
comes for our immortal prayer to be poured out like sweet incense poured out of 
golden vials.





CHAPTER 14

CHRIST PLEADS HIS WILL

"Father, I will that they also, whom thou hast given me, be with me where I am 
. . ." -- John 17:24.

Jesus presented the precious legacy of His prayer when He offered His 
intercessory prayer preserved for us by John. The Lord let His disciples have 
the pleasure of knowing what His intercession for them in heaven as their High 
Priest was like. The disciples had heard the Saviour pray for them many times, 
but they had never heard Him pray as He did at this particular time. They must 
have been deeply impressed by the simplicity of His approach to the Father. They 
heard Him pray with the implicit confidence of the Beloved Son, Who is co-equal 
and eternal with the Father. They must have realized that Christ breathed into 
His intercessory prayer the efficacy and power of His endless life.

Jesus presented the priceless legacy of His prayer to the Father when He said, 
"Father, I will that they also, whom thou hast given me, be with me where I am; 
that they may behold my glory, which thou gavest me: for thou lovedst me before 
the foundation of the world." These gracious words of Jesus reveal His final 
will regarding the blessed estate of the redeemed. His inalienable right to 
plead His will before the Father is based on His finished work in the world. He 
said,

"I have glorified thee on the earth: I have finished the work which thou gavest 
me to do." -- v. 4.

Jesus made it clear that His intercessory prayer is an integral part of His 
redemptive work on the cross. His finished work and His final will are one in 
the Divine plan of salvation.

It has pleased the Saviour to disclose the final fulfillment of all He has 
willed and devised for His purchased people. The pleasing prospect of being with 
Him where He is shall be fulfilled to the glory of the Father and to the 
everlasting admiration and joyful acclamation of His adoring saints.

It was difficult for the disciples to understand the Saviour's avowed purpose to 
go away. Their minds were sorely perplexed and their hearts troubled by the 
disturbing fact of His sufferings and death. They thought that He was leaving 
them alone to serve and suffer in a world hostile toward all they believed and 
preached. Perhaps they had almost reached the point of accepting final defeat 
when Jesus revived their faltering courage, saying,

"Let not your heart be troubled: ye believe in God, believe also in me. In my 
Father's house are many mansions: if it were not so, I would have told you. I go 
to prepare a place for you." -- John 14:1, 2.

Let us emphasize His gracious words, ". . . a place for you." Our Lord revealed 
the purpose of His departure when He uttered these immortal words. He lifted the 
veil between time and eternity to establish the faith of His troubled people. He 
enabled His ransomed saints to see the heavenly home of the soul with the eyes 
of their hearts. He would have His people rest their faith on His comforting 
words, "In my Father's house are many mansions . . ."

There will be no homeless children in the family of God. All shall dwell in 
stately mansions throughout the endless day. This unfriendly world has no 
permanent abiding place for the children of God. They were born in this world, 
and many shall be buried in this world, but this passing world is not their 
home. They have no continuing city on the earth. God's people are citizens of 
the celestial City, the heavenly Jerusalem, which John saw coming down from 
heaven, prepared as a bride adorned for her husband.

Perhaps we are disposed to think of the eternal pleasure and ineffable joys to 
be obtained in the place prepared for His people. We try to visualize the beauty 
of the City whose Builder and Maker is God. We are inclined to wonder about the 
skill of the Infinite Artist who has blended the seven prismatic colors of white 
light to enhance the resplendent glory of the holy habitation of the redeemed.

While meditating on the blessed hope of heaven let us not overlook the fact that 
our expectations are based on the finished work of Christ. Jesus said to the 
Father, "I have finished the work which thou gavest me to do." He made no 
mention of the price paid in blood and tears to prepare the place where we could 
be with Him to all eternity. He prays like One returning home after having 
completed an assigned task.

His vicarious sufferings on the middle cross provided the necessary fitness of 
moral character for us to share eternal bliss with Him in the Father's house. 
His intercessory prayer assures us that we can be sanctified through the truth. 
It is His will to cleanse us by His blood and present us holy and unblamable and 
unreproved in His sight. (Colossians 1:22.)

We have every reason to believe that we can avail ourselves of the blessed 
benefits of His finished work, and come to the end of life's journey and receive 
a grand welcome into the City of God. His finished work and final will are the 
sure foundation on which we rest our hope to be with Him where He is, and to 
behold His glory.

Jesus possessed a peculiar joy in achieving His Father's purpose in redemption. 
He had a peculiar pleasure in providing a place in the Father's house for His 
trusting people. His joy in bringing many sons unto glory enabled Him to triumph 
over His physical sufferings and anguish of soul.

The merciless mockery of the multitude, the scorning sneers of the scribes, and 
the reproaches of the riotous rabble could not turn Him from His fixed purpose 
to finish His work according to the will of the Father. The stripes, spittle, 
blood, and bruises could not defeat Him. The insults and indignities heaped upon 
Him could not overwhelm His fervent love for His homeless saints. Being numbered 
with the transgressors, He was crucified on a lonely hill called Calvary. He 
suffered, the Just for the unjust, that He might bring us to God.

He was despised by foes, derided by fanatics, and deserted by friends, but He 
triumphed over sin and death, and returned to the right hand of the majesty on 
High, and ever lives to make intercession for His saints.

It would be utterly impossible to imagine the overwhelming despair and dreadful 
disappointment that would sweep over the souls of the redeemed if Christ's 
prayer should not be answered. The black raven of despair would croak the dirge 
of eternal death on the graves of the godly. The living sons of God would lift 
up their voices in unutterable lament and bewail the day they heard the hope of 
the Gospel.

We have no fears and doubts regarding the final triumph of Christ's intercessory 
prayer. He has presented His petition as a legacy to be shared by His trusting 
people. His last will and testament has been signed by His nail-scarred hand and 
sealed by the Holy Spirit. Every word uttered in His immortal intercession shall 
be answered in full.

The voice of His supplication has been heard in high heaven, and the language of 
His weeping has been interpreted before the mercy seat of pure gold. His tears 
shall triumph and His petition shall be granted.

It is almost unbelievable that our Lord can find pleasure in holy fellowship 
with His ransomed people to all eternity. His prayer shows us that it is His 
will to dwell with His people in the sacred bond of love throughout all ages, 
world without end.

The greatest pleasure to be enjoyed in heaven will be the unspeakable pleasure 
of being with the Saviour for evermore. The glory of His presence shall make 
glad the City of God.

We would find no pleasure in beholding the beauty of the Father's house of many 
mansions if Christ were not present to fill it with the light of His 
countenance. The brightness of His glory, and beauty of His Person shall enhance 
the happiness of the redeemed. The river of life, the fruitful trees, and the 
anthems of angels enhance the joys of the habitation of the holy people, but 
these blessed realities would fail to satisfy the citizens of the land of 
endless day unless the glorified Son were present to receive their eternal 
praise.

Let us continue to pray that our Lord will count us worthy to receive the legacy 
of His intercessory prayer presented to the Father. Let us not fail to obtain 
the spiritual fitness provided for us in His finished work. We must ever be 
mindful of the fact that without holiness no man shall see the Lord.

Let us take comfort in the Saviour's immortal prayer, "Father, I will that they 
also, whom thou hast given me, be with me where I am; that they may behold my 
glory, which thou gavest me: for thou lovedst me before the foundation of the 
world."


THE END

